Abandon the Disabled|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/AbandonTheDisabled|"A character with a disability or deformity is abandoned by their family or caretakers. It could be that the character's parents can't afford their child's extra costs, they don't want a disabled individual, they think the child is cursed, or they don't want to deal with the personal loss of having their child die. Parents who want perfect Trophy Children will do this in extreme cases if they don't instead hide away their child from public view.
 Abandoning the person doesn't always imply abandoning them for dead. They could be left at an orphanage, hospital, doorstop, or some other facility. Sometimes, they'll be abandoned in a park or other setting with hopes that someone will pick them up.
 Alternatively, this trope can involve one of the parents leaving their lover after they have a disabled child together. This is usually the father. This also applies to other situations of walking out on a person due to a disability, such as someone who leaves their spouse after they get into an accident.
 This trope often appears in more ""primitive"" or dystopian societies where those with disabilities are ostracized. A Career-Ending Injury might lead to this in Proud Warrior Races.
 Often overlaps with Parental Abandonment and Type 4 of Bury Your Disabled. Compare to That Thing Is Not My Child! for Speculative Fiction examples involving clones, changelings, etc.
"
Abled in the Adaptation|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/AbledInTheAdaptation|"Sometimes in adaptations a character's physical or mental illness is removed or downplayed compared to the source. This could be for pragmatic reasons (such as the disability being difficult to adapt) but often times the disability is simply removed. One reason for the removal is to make a character more threatening.
 Sub-trope of Adaptation Deviation. Compare to Throwing Off the Disability and Adaptational Skill and contrast with Disabled in the Adaptation.
"
Albinos Are Freaks|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/AlbinosAreFreaks|"Genetic disorders are rarely brought up in fiction, but when they are, albinism  or in some cases leucism  is among the most common. Albinism is a genetic condition that results in little or no production of melanin, the compound responsible for hair, skin, and eye colors in many species. In fiction, this usually manifests as very pale or stark white skin and hair paired with red or purple eyes. Because this phenotype is highly unusual, it is oftentimes viewed with great suspicion.
 As such, most of the time these characters are social pariahs among their own people. At best, and especially if they occupy some high rank of authority, they'll be regarded with no small measure of fear by all. If not, they'll probably just be ignored or left to their own devices, which they might just prefer. At worst, though, they'll be actively shunned, exiled, abused, or subject to any other manner of horrific fate.
 The exact reason for this discrimination may vary from setting to setting. In many cases, the ostracization of an albino character will be linked to the supernatural and/or magical. In fact, many fantasy and horror stories that use this trope treat a character's albinism as directly related to any magical or supernatural abilities they might possess, or as a the result of being a victim of said activities; compare Locked into Strangeness. In other works, the actual supernatural and magical aspects will be stripped down to simple myth and superstition, making the character an innocent victim of both.
 Visually, albinism is very striking, and the introduction of one usually establishes that the character is of some plot importance even before they are properly introduced. Albinism, and the impact it has on others' treatment of someone with the condition, may be a source of the character's motivations.
 Compare White Hair, Black Heart, Undeathly Pallor, White and Red and Eerie All Over, and Red Eyes, Take Warning;noteIn Real Life, that last one doesn't show up too often among albinistic humans except under direct bright light, so more realistic examples will give such a character Creepy Blue Eyes instead. these visual associations with evil may contribute to the ostracization. Relatedly, meta-examples may play up albinistic traits as a villain's Red Right Hand; this form of the trope is common among The Morlocks, for example. In more realistic depictions of albinism, which tends to go hand in hand with vision problems and sun-sensitive skin, such a villain may also be an Evil Cripple with Four Eyes, Zero Soul. Expect them to be Prone to Sunburn and also be Weakened by the Light, which may be used against them.
 This trope also occasionally overlaps with Chocolate Baby if a dark-skinned father mistakes his kid's albinism for a sign that the mother cheated with a lighter-complexioned man.
 It's common for characters with albinism to have a Meaningful Name relating to the colour white, such as Snow, Bianca or just plain White. If not, they often have an Embarrassing Nickname related to their condition. It's also surprisingly common for characters to be simply called ""the Albino,"" especially if they don't have much plot importance.
 See also Mystical White Hair for white hair being associated with special powers. If an albinistic Animal Nemesis is depicted as uniquely formidable or aggressive, expect a Moby Schtick. Contrast White Wolves Are Special, Great White Feline and White Stallion for examples of albino/leucistic animals which are portrayed postitively. Compare and contrast White Bunny, which can be played both ways.
 For another disability that's often treated as an oddity, see Little People Are Surreal.
"
An Arm and a Leg|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/AnArmAndALeg|"Limb loss as dramatic device. Can come about in a variety of ways:
 May be the predecessor to Artificial Limbs, Arm Cannon, Hook Hand, or Swiss-Army Appendage. Frequently appears in the backstory of a Handicapped Badass. If played for laughs, it's Amusing Injuries; if there's no lasting damage it's Only a Flesh Wound. If it's a severed hand, expect it to be used in a Dead-Hand Shot. A character with Appendage Assimilation will simply stitch a new appendage on the gaping hole, and a character with a sufficiently powerful Healing Factor will grow the appendage back before long. Expect these characters to be extra-likely to lose their limbs in the first place so their abilities can be shown off.
 Interestingly enough, you almost never see a limb actually sewn back to the body of the victim, which is probably the most sensible thing you can do once deprived of it (provided that you're able to retrieve the lost limb in a reasonable amount of time and keep it in sanitary conditions). Although this is actually a well-known, albeit rare, occurrence in surgery with a decent ratio of success in terms of restoring partial or even full limb mobility (at least considering the complexity of the procedure; there is a lot of stuff that needs to be joined back together in your hand, mind you, not to mention the constant time pressure), most people are unaware of it and would probably ridicule the very idea.
 Note that this trope only applies when limb loss is deliberately used to advance the plot. It does not apply to pre-existing conditions or incidental carnage amongst background characters. If the incident leading to the loss is featured in a flashback, by all means, include it, but if we only see the character after it happens it doesn't count.
 Compare Knee-capping, and Agony of the Feet. Fake Arm Disarm is a bloodless version of this trope, whereas a Literal Disarming is this trope done for the explicit purpose of removing someone's ability to fight or wield weapons. If the injury specifically represents or comments upon some aspect of the character it counts as Symbolic Mutilation.
 Arranged by medium as usual, but please note what type it is at the beginning of the entry.
"
Arm Cannon|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/ArmCannon|"A specific type of Artificial Limbs that's Exactly What It Says on the Tin: a ranged weapon integrated with a character's arm. Or their leg; we're pretty flexible here, although they'd have to be good at shooting while crouched, as you'd probably have to be on all fours or sitting to aim a leg-mounted weapon. And it doesn't have to be literally a cannon; a machine gun or multi-shot rifle or shotgun is also acceptable. Generally, his trope includes any ranged weapon or gun used in place of (or as) a prosthetic.
 While impressive these weapons are far from practical for numerous reasons. First, the recoil from an actual cannon would tear the the rest of the limb off, potentially killing the operator. Second, any ranged weapon (machine gun, shotgun, rifle, handgun) will have some recoil; if it's attached to the person (as a prosthetic would be) the recoil would at least mess up their aim for additional shots, and probably spin them around. Third, any weapon large enough to to qualify as a cannon would be so much weight on one limb that it would be next to impossible to maintain balance or get a steady enough stance to aim it, much less use the arm in melee combat. Fourth, barring some sort of advanced cooling system, any gun like weapon will heat when fired, almost certainly injuring a user keeping the gun directly on their skin. Five, the placement of the gun would make loading ammo or maintenance awkward at best and severely limit the amount of ammo that could be carried. Sixth, triggering an arm weapon requires either mechanical design that may require the other arm or exotic technology to connect directly to the brain. Seventh, having a loaded gun on or replacing a limb is just begging for accidental discharges when doing mundane tasks, even just walking with it.
 There are two general types. One is the complete replacement of a hand, or even an entire arm, with a gun. Realistically, these make very little sense, as getting an Artificial Limb would allow you to hold a gun, and do other mundane tasks with the limb when you're not in combat. Arm Cannons that fully replace the limb are also prone to suffering Fake Arm Disarms, as they can be destroyed without gravely injuring the wielder. A specialized version is a robotic hand that turns into a gun. This version often overlaps with the Hand Blast trope.
 The other, more mundane version, is simply a gun that's attached to the arm  generally with the hand still intact. This might also involve Artificial Limbs, but just as often uses a special harness or weaponised vambrace. Occasionally, the weapon may fit over the forearm and hand, giving the appearance of the first kind. More discreet versions often overlap with Nothing Up My Sleeve. Aiming it is usually a simple matter of pointing in the general direction of whatever it is you want to shoot. Using your free arm to brace the cannon before firing is optional, partly because reducing weapon sway and/or recoil improves your accuracy, but mostly because it makes the resulting shot look more powerful (or at least more awesome).
 Both kinds generally come with Bottomless Magazines, and are often fired by thought alone. Larger versions of both types are common on Humongous Mecha, which can be conveniently designed to carry them from the start.
 At any case, some arm cannons look like trumpets by design.
 For a weaponised arm that isn't a gun, see Power Fist, Rocket Punch, and especially Blade Below the Shoulder (and sometimes Pile Bunker). Not to be confused with Hand Cannon. Or, for that matter, Armed with Canon. Compare Shoulder Cannon, Leg Cannon, and Hand Blast. Finger Firearms is a small subtrope.
"
Artificial Limbs|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/ArtificialLimbs|"A number of heroes and villains in video games, anime and science fiction either start off with or receive an artificial limb over the course of the story, usually to offset the poignant loss of an appendage. This can either be due to an injury, or in rare cases intentional mutilation. Said prosthetics will almost always function perfectly, as if the character had never lost the limb to begin with, save for malfunctions that relate to the story.
 Artificial limbs will often grant superhuman strength, frequently overlooking the fact that even if your arm has the strength to lift a tanker truck, doing so would very probably crush your spine unless it were similarly reinforced. Or, the arm will bend, but follow the path of least resistance, and simply rip itself out of the shoulder joint.
 If you're in an era where cybernetics are not just in the future but ridiculously so, never fear: the Rule of Cool allows you to get Steampunk limbs instead. Nevermind that this makes little sense in terms of nerve connections and power source. A fantasy world may substitute magical prosthetic limbs (based on the magic that produces the Golem), but this is rare since such worlds can usually use the same magic to regenerate lost limbs instead.
 The darker the setting, the more likely cyber-bits are to cause loss of humanity of some sortsometimes it's actually called ""soul"", but you often get workarounds like ""essence"" or ""vitality"", and magic wielders, in settings that have both, generally can't have too much cyberware. Especially common in roleplaying games, as a balancing measure so that rich characters can't just have their whole bodies replaced.
 Quite fortunately, this is also a case of Truth in Television. While they can't give you superhuman powers, prosthetic limbs are becoming more and more advanced, allowing people who've lost a limb a chance to live more normal lives. As a real-life example of the belief that artificial limbs may be better in some ways than biological ones, the International Association of Athletics Federations has banned certain artificial limbs in competitions it governs, including the Olympics, due to a still controversial claim that certain prosthetics may provide some athletes with an unfair advantage.
 See also Brain/Computer Interface for characters getting ""jacks"" implanted to connect to computers via cable (or even LAN!), and Swiss-Army Appendage for characters who hot-swap their Artificial Limbs. Often a result of the We Can Rebuild Him style of Emergency Transformation. If the limb is awesome enough, it might be a Badass Transplant, and is usually an example of Fashionable Asymmetry. Often can result in Limb-Sensation Fascination when someone explores their new limb. See Prosthetic Limb Reveal for instances where a character is suddenly revealed to have an artificial limb or two despite not looking like they'd have any. Often occurs when the supposedly real limb is shot off or otherwise injured, only to see that it was artificial. For someone who keeps getting prosthetics, see Serial Prostheses.
 An alternative is Cloning Body Parts, where the missing organ is simply replaced with a cloned copy. If a species is merely born with strange appendages, that's Bizarre Alien Limbs.
"
Attention Deficit... Ooh, Shiny!|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/AttentionDeficitOohShiny|"Hello, Tropers. Welcome to the page of multiple interruptions for picking up stuff off the  Ooh, a page telling us to describe this trope here!
 In media, the symptoms of attention deficit disorders tend to be exaggerated to the point of absurdity. Sufferers seem to be on a constant caffeine high. They are unable to maintain focus on anything for more than a few minutes before getting distracted by a shiny object, hence the trope title.
 In reality, ADHD (Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder) consists of a whole set of symptoms, some detrimental and some beneficial. For example, one person with ADHD might be very social and loves talking to different people, gets excited about discovering new things, and sometimes loses track of what's happening around them; and another might be reclusive and shy and unable to perform well in a controlled setting, but really opens up with a close friend or when talking about something that interests them (for more information on ADHD in real life, see our useful notes page).
 There are a few simple reasons for this trope. First is a rampant misunderstanding about what ADHD actually is (in which case you should go do some research), resulting in the oversimplification and exaggeration.note The misdiagnosis of ADHD/ADD, especially with the rampant Ritalin craze in the '80s, have really shaped public opinion towards this disorder. Bear in mind, though, there are people who legitimately have ADHD out there.  Second, it's much funnier to have a character who just fidgets and spaces out occasionally without having to worry about the realism of adding other dimensions to their personality.
 If this type of character has Animal Motifs, they're often associated with dogs, squirrels, kittens, or ferrets.
 See also Hollywood Psych, Hollywood Autism, The Schizophrenia Conspiracy, and ""L"" Is for ""Dyslexia"". Similar types include the Absent-Minded Professor, Forgetful Jones, and the Cloudcuckoolander (who may or may not have a disorder). This exaggeration is frequently seen in Genki Girls and Keets. Can often overlap with Easily Impressed where people are amazed easily rather than distracted. These symptoms are well within the very wide range of symptoms that you might see in any character with an unspecified diagnosis. Attention Deficit Creator Disorder may be what you get when an artistically inclined individual has a case of this in Real Life.
 Closely related is What Does This Button Do?, which you can expect to hear often from such individuals. Hilarity may or may not ensue. Liable to Forget To Eat, right up until the point that a Delicious Distrac- HEY! Are those chocolate chip cookies?! Mmmm....
 Not to Be Confused with oh, wow! Look at all the examples!
"
Autism in Media|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/AutismInMedia|"Works that deal with Autism and/or Asperger's Syndrome and the portrayals of those on the autism spectrum (for better or for worse).
 Note that characters Diagnosed by the Audience or coded autistic charactersExplanationcharacters who aren't explicitly autistic but bear enough parallels to be highly relatable to autistic audiences are not to be included in this list, nor media that only deals with autism as an ""issue of the week"" situation.
 See also Creators on the Autism Spectrum and Diagnosis of God.
"
Blind and the Beast|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/BlindAndTheBeast|"A character with a freakish appearance, experiencing loneliness, happens to stumble into a blind person who doesn't realize that the freak is not quite human. They strike up a friendship or even romance, and the audience learns An Aesop that blind people might be better than we are because they are quicker to recognize inner beauty.
 Usually the deception doesn't last forever, but by the time the blind person finds out what the other ""looks"" like, they've already come to appreciate the person inside.
"
Blind Black Guy|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/BlindBlackGuy|"A very common form of Twofer Token Minority is the blind black guy. He's blind, and he's black. He may wear Cool Shades as is common in real life. He frequently overlaps with Magical Negro in a Blind Seer insight kind of way and/or Handicapped Badass. The characters are more often than not based on Ray Charles or Stevie Wonder, and thus tend to be a Blind Musician as well.
 The real-life source of this is that, in 19th and 20th centuries, many blue-collar Americans lost their sight due to poor working conditions, methanol poisoning from bad moonshine, and insufficient medical care, especially for black people, and since most workers in such positions were men, the end result was a disproportionate number of blind black men. Many who were born blind or lost their sight early were deliberately pushed towards musical training, as one of the few careers available to them that didn't require sight.
"
Blind Mistake|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/BlindMistake|"This is when a character makes some kind of error to do with their surroundings simply because they lack sight, either permanently or due to Temporary Blindness, or have misplaced their glasses. It can be anything from mistaking one object for another, one person for another, one location for another, or even whether something is there or not. For example, the character could pick up a bottle of vegetable oil instead of the intended bottle of water and drink it.
 The character doesn't have to be completely blind, either  people who are extremely near- or farsighted, or whose vision is extremely blurry, can also do this. Or it might just be dark.
 This trope is used generally for comedic effect. Often greatly exaggerated, to the point of serious Fridge Logic.
"
Blind Musician|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/BlindMusician|"The Trope Maker is probably Homer, the semi-legendary 8th-century BCE bard credited with two cornerstones of Western literature.
 See also Your Eyes Can Deceive You, Blind Black Guy. May be a Handicapped Badass. A Sub-Trope of Genius Cripple.
 Subtrope of Ironically Disabled Artist. Compare and contrast Deaf Composer, when an artist's disability directly conflicts with their skill.
"
Blind People Wear Sunglasses|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/BlindPeopleWearSunglasses|"If you see a blind person in fiction, chances are they'll be sporting a pair of sunglasses.
 This is Truth in Television. There are a few legitimate reasons a blind person may wear sunglasses:
 This Truth in Television is very helpful to creating fiction, as an animator doesn't have to draw eyes that aren't looking at anything, and sighted live-action actors playing blind characters can still see while playing the role without it being obvious that their eyes are moving around and focusing on things.
 The Blind Black Guy is prone to wearing sunglasses. See Prophet Eyes for another (albeit less realistic) method of demonstrating a character's lack of sight. Should a character pretend to be blind, expect them to wear sunglasses as part of the disguise. Might justify Sunglasses at Night. Has nothing to do with Blind Without 'Em.
"
Blind Seer|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/BlindSeer|"The Blind Seer is an old archetype. They are blind, and yet they can see more than we can, metaphorically speaking, by using heightened senses, divination, or some type of magical powers to gain knowledge of the world around them.
 It is a recurring theme in mythology; Justice is blind, Odin plucked out an eye to gain knowledge, and the Graeae had had only one eye among three of them. Time and time again, the sacrifice of sight is shown to result in greater cosmic knowledge.
 This trope is the reason that being born with a caul (common with the Magical Seventh Son) is taken as a sign that a child will have seer-like powers. A common version of the legend says that the seventh son of a seventh son will be born with a caul (actually a loose flap of amniotic sac) over his face, to signify the Seer-like power.
 A special case of Disability Superpower, often demonstrated with Prophet Eyes. Blindfolds are another favorite.
"
Blind Weaponmaster|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/BlindWeaponmaster|"They hold their staff (or other weapon) like they know what they're doing, but since they're completely without sight surely they aren't that dangerous, right? Wrong. The Blind Weaponmasters are some of the most deadly adversaries a character can face. In possession of supernatural senses born from blindness or just Badass Normal enough to compensate for the weaponmaster's loss with other natural senses, the Blind Weaponmaster will surprise any overconfident character and make heroes push their skill to its limits. A blind weaponmaster may invoke Your Eyes Can Deceive You by fighting in a visibly challenging location such as fog or total darkness which would even out the drawback or even reverse it on the weaponmaster 's opponent instead. The Blind Weaponmaster's weapon of choice is stereotypically a staff, but other blunt weapons have been used as well. Blades are rare but not unheard of.
 A subtrope of Handicapped Badass. See also the aforementioned Your Eyes Can Deceive You for when normally-sighted characters would have to fight without the use of their eyes.
"
Blindness in Media|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/BlindnessInMedia|"Media that depicts people who are blind or are legally blind. This page is for works that have prominent characters who are blind or legally blind.
"
Bullying the Disabled|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/BullyingTheDisabled|"An easy way to make a character loathsome is to have them ostracize or tease someone with a (usually physical) disability. Most bullies wouldn't mock someone for having a disability  it's seen as too mean to mock someone who is ""helpless"" or someone who has an issue they have no control over  so only the most cruel characters do. Usually only younger characters act this way, however adults and even parents are also known to.
 This is also a lesser-known part of fascist rhetoric in real life. In addition to the better-known racism, antisemitism, homophobia, and more, they also consider disabled people to be parasitic drains on society.
 Compare to Bury Your Disabled and Abandon the Disabled. Sub-Trope to Kick the Dog and Moral Event Horizon. May be a reason for the disabled character Hiding the Handicap. Also compare to its approximate counterpart Disability as an Excuse for Jerkassery. Contrast Handicapped Badass, where bullies should not mess with this disabled character or they will be disabled.
"
Bury Your Disabled|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/BuryYourDisabled|"Bury Your Disabled happens when a disabled character (be it physically or mentally) is killed off in a movie or TV Show. There are four types of Bury Your Disabled:
 More than likely the character in question is being killed off by the writers specifically because they are disabled. This is usually a plot point that is supposed to be a Tear Jerker or, in the case of horror movies, meant to be shocking. This can also combine with Littlest Cancer Patient: the frail, wheelchair-bound waif is Too Good for This Sinful Earth, and their death will be a sweet release at the end.
 Bury Your Disabled will most likely happen to a current or (near-)future wheelchair user, but other disabilities are not discriminated against as much. See also Death by Disfigurement, which has some similar implications, I Will Only Slow You Down, where a disabled person volunteers to be left behind, Living Is More than Surviving, which is sometimes used to justify the ""Suicide"" and ""Mercy Kill"" examples, and Throwing Off the Disability, the other common way to ""dispose of"" a disabled character. Compare to Bullying the Disabled (which can also lead to this) and Abandon the Disabled.
"
Career-Ending Injury|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/CareerEndingInjury|"A Career-Ending Injury is a sudden and unexpected injury or illness that causes disability to a person and forces them to give up their ambitions and dreams.
 Usually, this trope involves an athlete getting an injury, but the career can be anything that requires physical and/or mental ability. Likewise, what causes the disability can be something other than an injury (for example, a disease)  the important point is that it prevents the character from achieving their goals by causing a disability.
 A variation is where a previously known condition or illness worsens unexpectedly to a point where the character is no longer fit for his/her career. With a character known for being injury-prone or just too stubborn to know when to quit, this injury may represent the writing on the wall.
 Sometimes the injury is part of the backstory, but if it happens during the course of the main story, expect Angst.
 Very much Truth in Television. In circles such as the police or the military, this is sometimes sardonically called ""earning a desk job"". With sports where knee collisions are a regular occurrence, the injury might be so bad that standing up (after it healed) without a cane is impossible.
 The injury may have started as a Game-Breaking Injury. Compare White-Dwarf Starlet and I Coulda Been a Contender!, common results of this trope, Dream-Crushing Handicap, where the character is disabled to start with instead of becoming so during their career, and Crippling the Competition, where this trope is invoked. If the character overcomes the injury, either temporarily or permanently, then they're Back in the Saddle. If the injury isn't just career-ending but life-ending, then it's an example of Fatal Method Acting. May result in the character taking on a Post-Injury Desk Job.
 Conversely, the Deaf Composer doesn't let a little thing like being physically unable to practice their career stop them from doing it.
 This is sometimes set up as a twist or a reveal, so beware of spoilers.
"
Colorblind Confusion|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/ColorblindConfusion|"In Real Life, partial (""red-green"" or ""blue-yellow"") and full colorblindness are among the most common disabilities, affecting around 8% of males and 0.5% of females worldwide, with the number possibly being even higher as many people go through life unaware that they have the condition due to it not causing problems in their lives.
 In fiction, however, a character having this is usually a Chekhov's Gun or is only brought up in a situation where being able to distinguish colors is vitally important, such as a Wire Dilemma or needing to identify a key object by color alone. The fact that colorblindness is usually inherited means it can also be used to prove or disprove a character's parentage if they have it while another character does or does not, though much like the AB Negative trope the mechanism of inheritance is often over-simplified, especially with females who are far more likely to be an asymptomatic carrier for the condition unless they get it from both sides, due to the most common gene associated with the condition being carried on the X Chromosome. It's also sometimes used as an explanation for a character's horrendous fashion sense, in which case it's often Played for Laughs. Since colorblindness can disqualify a person from receiving certain types of licenses, especially aircraft, a character learning they have this is sometimes used as a Dream-Crushing Handicap.
 May also occur with Funny Animal or Uplifted Animal characters pointing out that their species is naturally colorblind as a Furry Reminder. When this trope is applied to dogs it's a case of Science Marches On, as it's now known that while dogs may not see colors as well as humans they're still able to distinguish them.
 Compare Blind Mistake, where a character being unable to see at all causes confusion, and Animals See in Monochrome (which often uses this trope). Not to be confused with Colorblind Casting, where an actor's race is not taken into account when casting a role.
"
Crippling Overspecialization|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/CripplingOverspecialization|"Competitive Balance exists so that there is some symmetry between specific advantages and the Necessary Drawback. If someone can hit hard but is easily hurt, they are a Glass Cannon. If they are unstoppably strong but slow-moving, they are a Mighty Glacier. If they are incredibly fast but go down quickly when hit, they are a Fragile Speedster. A crippling overspecialization occurs when an obscenely powerful advantage makes a trade-off that limits how effective it is.
 In some Real-Time Strategy games, unit types are often specialized beyond all reason. They often have only one weapon, effective against just one particular kind of enemy, and usually cannot defend themselves at all if their particular weapon is ineffective. The most prominent examples can be seen in this genre: explosives will deal low damage to infantrynotethough maybe the problem isn't so much with their damage as with their accuracy, while Anti-Aircraft cannons can't defend against ground units. This is usually a result of game balance. After all, if tanks are effective enough against other tanks and infantry, then why build anything else? Additionally, units in games are traditionally depicted with only one weapon. A few might have a second gun used for attacking enemy fliers, but that's about it.
 Can result from a Tactical RockPaperScissors design scheme, from intensive Min-Maxing in a character build, or a case of Highly Specific Counterplay. People who do this for Elemental Rock-Paper-Scissors are suffering from Poor, Predictable Rock.
 See also Anti-Air, Cumbersome Claws, and Strong Flesh, Weak Steel. Compare to An Adventurer Is You, where this is used to force players to work together. See also Sacrificed Basic Skill for Awesome Training for a characterization equivalent and Single-Task Robot for a robot equivalent. Severely Specialized Store is a comedic variation. Diminishing Returns for Balance is when a game forces this by having a combat build that invests everything into one aspect being less effective than a more well-rounded playstyle.
 Don't confuse ""having a weakness"" or ""not being the best at everything"" or even ""not being quite good enough"" as being this trope. Don't be tempted to list something because it failed in some way unless you can point a finger at its crippling specialty!
 The opposites of this trope are The Red Mage, Jack of All Stats, and Master of All. At the other extreme that loops right back is Master of None, where the character has no great specialization... but sucks at everything anyway.
"
Crippling the Competition|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/CripplingTheCompetition|"Sometimes someone is just too good at something. There is no way you can beat them at it. Or they have humiliated you once too often in their field of expertise. You decide to fix it so they can never beat you ever again.
 Crippling the Competition is when someone, usually a villain, injures their rival to get the advantage. A Sub-Trope of Career-Ending Injury, Crippling the Competition is always a deliberate act done with malice and forethought. Can overlap with Game-Breaking Injury if it occurs during the final showdown.
 Sometimes the opponent to the crippled competition isn't actually the one who did the deed and said opponent may not even have desired it. In these cases, the person responsible for crippling the competition generally is either a misguided fan trying to help, or a third party that stands to gain from a certain outcome of the match.
 When applied to superpowered beings, this trope may lead to them being Brought Down to Normal.
 Often overlaps with Fingore. Frequently leads to Throwing Off the Disability. A Sub-Trope of Removing the Rival. It's commonly the purpose of Unnecessary Roughness unless the roughness has no purpose and is just For the Evulz.
 Different from Make an Example of Them, where in some cases the victim's punishment might deliberately target their ability to perform, but the motivation is not the fear of competition. For example, this trope would be a bunch of mobsters might break the legs of a championship marathon runner so the guy they're betting on will win, whereas, with Make an Example of Them, the mobsters break the marathon runner's legs because he failed to pay his gambling debts.
 Note that in real life this can backfire, especially in team sports, where a player getting taken out can encourage their teammates to step up their game. Some coaches even tell their players to ""punish them on the scoreboard"" rather than physically retaliating.
 Not to be confused with Blasting It Out of Their Hands. If the person being crippled attempts to compete or fight anyway, this may lead to You Can Barely Stand. And if the person tries to compete despite the attempted crippling, you can always Attack the Injury during the competition to make sure it pays off.
"
Cute Mute|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/CuteMute|"The Cute Mute has an appearance that's innocent to a fault. Whatever situation that causes their inability to speak also gives them that clueless, childlike demeanor. Unlikely to know or grasp social conventions, they will often be found innocently doing awkward things that spell trouble for the other characters.
 Lack of speaking alone does not qualify a character for this trope. Someone who can't speak but otherwise doesn't fit the trope is The Speechless. Someone who is physically able to speak but chooses not to is Elective Mute; someone who can and does speak but is never shown to do so onscreen is The Voiceless. Also compare with Speech-Impeded Love Interest.
 In a musical, she's often The Singing Mute. See also Sexy Flaw, for when the character's muteness is seen as a romantic ""turn-on"".
"
Dark Lord on Life Support|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/DarkLordOnLifeSupport|"An event has left a villain severely injured or drained of power. So, their minions hook them up to a device that will keep them alive for the time being. It doesn't have to be a machine; it can be the inability to survive without attaching to another body.
 This can be a way of creating sympathy for the villain by showing that they are weak or dependent. The weakness can be exploited by someone attacking them  the Evil Overlord may not have full strength because of what's happened to them or may be stuck in one place. Dependence means that The Hero can destroy the support system to destroy their enemy (although there might be moral issues with dealing the killing blow to a villain who can't fight back). Frequently, the very thing that made the Dark Lord this way was done by the hero, sometimes in a battle that didn't succeed in completely killing the villain. This can be a sign that the hero wasn't ready to fight the villain, that they did so rashly, etc.
 Please note that it is possible for said Dark Lord to recover from this, maybe even come back stronger than ever.
 Aesthetically, this trope associates the villain with illness and death, which in turn makes them seem creepier than he would be otherwise.
 Usually a subtrope of Man in the Machine. This may result in a Dragon-in-Chief and/or The Heavy, as well as a case of Weak Boss, Strong Underlings. May or may not be an Evil Cripple. Can also be a good reason to employ Orcus on His Throne and may be a Greater-Scope Villain. See also Red Right Hand, Brain in a Jar, Cybernetics Eat Your Soul, and No Immortal Inertia. May also be a trait of a villainous Symbiote. Compare and contrast We Can Rebuild Him for when this makes a villain stronger, not weaker. For when the dark lord creates themself a new body to replace their old one, see Self-Constructed Being. See also Strong Empire, Shriveled Emperor, which this can be a particularly extreme version of when the Dark Lord on Life Support also happens to rule a powerful force. Compare Sealed Evil in a Can, when the above-mentioned defeat completely incapacitated him, but there's still a danger they could come back from it.
"
The Darkness Before Death|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/TheDarknessBeforeDeath|"When someone is dying, one of the first senses to shut down is the sight, either fading to black or white.
 In order to qualify for the trope, the cause of the blindness must be because the person is in the process of dying. Deaths caused as a side-effect of being blinded or being physically blinded by, say, having your eyes cut/stabbed out don't qualify. Also, the eyes shutting down as a result of multiple organ failures throughout the body count if said organ failure is the cause of death.
 This is Truth in Television, albeit most examples exaggerate the trope for drama. If the character's death is Played for Laughs (intentionally or not), this may lead to Long-Lasting Last Words about being in the dark.
 Subtrope of Five-Second Foreshadowing. Often accompanied by Blood from the Mouth. Compare I'm Cold... So Cold..., where it's the character's own temperature a signal that they're dying instead of their own visual sense. Contrast Death by Disfigurement, where the eyes are physically damaged, while this is just the body failing to the point where sight also failsnoteAlso Death by Disfigurement doesn't have the disfigurement cause death directly, but rather death follows soon after in the plot so the character isn't forced to live with their disfigurement, Unfortunate Implications included., Go into the Light and My Life Flashed Before My Eyes. Not to be confused with Darkness Equals Death, where the scene getting dark indicates that something deadly is nearby.
"
Deaf Composer|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/DeafComposer|"The Deaf Composer trope refers to any creator who enjoys composing, cooking, painting, singing, sculpting, or some other creative activity, yet they can never experience it first-hand because they suffer from a loss of one (or more) of the senses most closely tied with their art or have a unique biology that won't allow them to experience their creations. This usually results in or from Sense Loss Sadness, though it may just be that the Deaf Composer has found a way to compensate  la Disability Superpowers or found a workaround than enables them to keep creating despite their disability. They may pursue this passion either out of a love of it or as a means to compensate for their disability.
 While this can be Played for Laughs with the Deaf Composer character who is a cook also being a Lethal Chef (or just amazingly bad for non-cooking arts), it can just as easily be Played for Drama with the character struggling heroically with their Tragic Dream. Interestingly, they may not necessarily be bad at cooking, painting, etc., making quite competent creations. However, these may suffer from being by-the-numbers and uncreative due to the lack of all required senses, while other times it's that very same drawback that gives them such a unique and passionate perspective they blow rivals out of the water.
 This trope is named in honor of Ludwig van Beethoven, who in the later years of his life continued to compose despite becoming mostly deaf (he didn't start deaf, however). Being an alien spy probably helped. He was able to compose while being deaf because he was such a brilliant musician that he could ""hear"" his symphonies' hundred-plus instruments in his imagination.
 Subtrope of Ironically Disabled Artist, which is for all cases where a disability contrasts the method of creating art (not just in a way that involves an absence of senses). Contrast Creative Sterility, where a character is unable to create art (or procreate) not because they lack the corresponding senses but out of a lack of creative spark. Compare Blind Musician, for visually impaired music artists. Opposite of Dream-Crushing Handicap, where it becomes physically impossible to follow the dream.
"
Deafness in Media|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/DeafnessInMedia|"This list is for works that feature deaf characters prominently.
"
Depraved Dwarf|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/DepravedDwarf|"Dwarfs (not that kind, the real kind)noteDwarves are fantasy creatures; dwarfs are short humans, and the polite term for the latter nowadays is ""little people."" This is, however, a relatively recent distinction that started with J. R. R. Tolkien. As in nearly everything else, most later fantasy authors have either followed his lead or not done so in a very pointed way to make a statement of some kind. in fiction are fairly uncommon. When they do show up, they tend to be either comic relief or playing the aforementioned fantasy creatures. But then, there's these guys.
 The Depraved Dwarf is a pint-sized bucket of malice. He (and it's pretty much always a he) is either a sadistic psychopath, a twisted rapist (presumably of the Mickey-slipping variety rather than the hold-them-down type), or at the very least a violent, cold-blooded criminal. They tend to show up when the hero has been rendered helpless. Often, expect giggling. Can go hand in hand with The Napoleon, if the Depraved Dwarf's misanthropy is implied to be a response  albeit a misdirected one  to discrimination and abuse faced as a result of their short stature.
 If he's The Don or a similar leadership role, see Mister Big. May or may not overlap with Little People Are Surreal. For villains with other disabilities, see Evil Cripple and Eunuchs Are Evil. May be part of a Subverted Suspicion Aesop if his being evil is treated as a plot twist. Contrast The Morlocks, who are the more depraved cousins of dwarves the fantasy race.
"
Diagnosed by the Audience|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/DiagnosedByTheAudience|"This character's behaviour is bizarrely outside the norm  it's way beyond mere ordinary quirkiness. No reasons are given for the strange behaviour. No specific diagnosis is ever mentioned in the story. In fact, any resemblance to any real disorder is likely accidental; the character's symptoms are exactly those symptoms the writer wants them to have. However, perhaps the audience has an idea of what disorder they have, and try their hand at diagnosing them.
 A lot of mentally ill people in classical literature, especially from the 19th century and earlier, tend to not be explicitly diagnosed; psychiatry was a very young field back then (and, until a certain point in history, didn't exist at all), and so there was no manual to turn to if you wanted to give your character odd quirks. Even if an author did do the research, psychiatry has changed greatly and rapidly, meaning that their work is very likely to be invalidated by the passing of time anyway. Also, the lack of psychiatric expertise during these periods means that many historical figures might have had undiagnosed conditions (vast Wild Mass Guessing exists about this topic).
 Compare The Disease That Shall Not Be Named, Soap Opera Disease, Victorian Novel Disease, and G-Rated Mental Illness. The Mad Hatter, who understands himself to be insane and is largely justified in this, will usually have an ambiguous understanding of his own insanity (as opposed to having some educated self-diagnosis of schizoid personality).
 For when a character is explicitly confirmed in-story to have a specific disorder, but their portrayal isn't necessarily accurate, please check Hollywood Psych, Hollywood Autism, Hollywood Tourette's, Obsessively Organized, ""L"" Is for ""Dyslexia"", Attention Deficit... Ooh, Shiny!, Funny Schizophrenia, and The Schizophrenia Conspiracy. When the creators say whether a character has a disorder or not outside of the work, making it no longer ambiguous in most cases, see Diagnosis of God. When the character's disorder is initially ambiguous but is confirmed later in the work, see Delayed Diagnosis. If the characters don't know what it is but the audience does, it's Disease by Any Other Name.
 See also, Trans Audience Interpretation, which is when a characters traits make the audience think that they may be Transgender in some way.
 That said, No Real Life Examples, Please! We don't want to start any sessions of ""armchair diagnosis"" for real people, since that kind of speculation about real people inevitably leads to controversy.
"
Diagnosis of God|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/DiagnosisOfGod|"Clusters of traits found together in one character may lead audiences to armchair diagnose that character with a real-life disorder sharing those traits, regardless of the creator's intentions. In response, a creator confirms outside of the work that they intend for their character to have a real-life disorder, whether one categorized as mental (like depression), neurological (like autism), or physical (like a traumatic brain injury); alternatively, they deny it. These statements can be made for many reasons, such as stopping characters from being Diagnosed by the Audience (and if it's creator-confirmed, it no longer applies for that) or clarifying their setting lacks an in-universe equivalent for the definitions and treatment of the out-of-universe disorder.
 Hollywood Psych may apply. Creators often believe they're depicting a disorder, but base their depiction on outdated or incomplete understanding. Some creators do have experience with diagnosing real people, but even within the various fields trained in diagnostic techniques and treatment, people disagree about what defines any given disorder and the criteria gets revised.
 See also: Word of Gay (similar trope), Word Of God (supertrope), Autism in Media (index with examples that may have been confirmed outside of the work or not). This does not have to be used to know someone is a Mad God, but a character who is a god can be an example of this trope if the creator says so.
"
Disability Alibi|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/DisabilityAlibi|"The detectives are checking every suspect in a murder or other serious crime, leaving no stone unturned. One suspect was near the victim, they act suspicious when questioned and they have no alibi.
 But wait, he couldn't have done it. He couldn't have killed the person, as he's not physically capable.
 Maybe he is completely disabled and needs special assistance for day-to-day life. Maybe he is otherwise incapacitated or injured so as to be unable to perform such activity as the crime featured, or perhaps he simply was in recovery from a previous injury at the time. Either way, he's probably innocent, because he couldn't have done it.
 Of course, it's possible he had someone else do the dirty work for him. It's also possible he is only pretending to be disabled. Or maybe he is disabled, but he used some mechanical contraption to kill the victim or do other physical actions. Maybe they are disabled, but they conned or tricked the victim into putting themselves in a vulnerable position.
 Subtrope of The Alibi. See Varying Competency Alibi when a character is either too competent or incompetent to commit the deed.
"
Disability as an Excuse for Jerkassery|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/DisabilityAsAnExcuseForJerkassery|"Contrary to many people's preconceptions that disabled people are all nice or otherwise pleasant to be around much like many depictions of the Magical Differently Abled Person, disability does not prevent the person with it from being an unpleasant person. Some will even use their ""illness"" to get away with saying things that are at best inappropriate, and at worst outright offensive.
 Another variation will have the character claim to have the disability despite the lack of a professional diagnosis, or fake the symptoms so that they can get diagnosed with it. This character generally comes from a privileged background and has thus become accustomed to treating other people poorly. Usually, this character is just a Jerkass or Attention Whore, and would be exactly the same if they did not have or did not claim to have the disability. A popular subject for this over the Internet is Asperger Syndrome.noteOn the internet, people who falsely claim to have Asperger's are often referred to as having ""Ass-burgers""
 The ""faking it"" variation is a parody of similar behavior in real life, which can be a Berserk Button for people who actually are disabled, due to the prejudice they are targeted with every day compounded with having to put up with ignorant assholes who are adding insult to their injury by claiming to have it just to get attention and/or have a convenient excuse for being a jerk.
 A Sub-Trope of Acquired Situational Narcissism. Arguably an in-universe example of Flawless Token. When a disabled character is not entirely jerkass, but just snarky, they are a Disabled Snarker. When a disabled character isn't just a jerk but also evil, then it's Evil Cripple. When a character uses their age rather than an illness to get away with similar behavior it's Screw Politeness, I'm a Senior!. When a character's disability has real negative effects on their personality or behavior, it's Ailment-Induced Cruelty.
 There is some Truth in Television to it: a disability can have a serious impact on a person's personality traits. How much, depends on many factors: the circumstances that led to the disability, the type of life held before the accident (a bookworm may adapt to a wheelchair more easily than a sportsman), the level of support of friends and family, previous personality, how old were they when they became disabled (someone born deaf is less likely to experience Sense Loss Sadness than an young adult who lost their hearing), etc. It goes without saying that clumsy handling of the trope can very easily result in Unfortunate Implications. Of course, No Real Life Examples, Please!
"
Disability Immunity|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/DisabilityImmunity|"This is a subtrope of Disability Superpower where, rather than a character's disability giving them an actual power, it instead renders them immune to some sort of attack, trap, or ploy that would otherwise be effective against them.
 See also: Disability Superpower (for when this grants other abilities to compensate), Your Brain Won't Be Much of a Meal, Too Kinky to Torture, Too Dumb to Fool, Too Broken to Break, Insanity Immunity (which fall under the ""frame of mind"" variation), Organ Dodge (which can overlap with ""already harmed in such a way""), Kryptonite Factor (for the opposite; someone being more vulnerable to something to balance out their power), and Fictional Disability.
 Similar to No-Sell, except that this trope justifies the immunity. See also One Curse Limit, when being affected by one thing grants immunity to being affected by anything else. Compare Curse That Cures, when a sick or injured character is cured as a side effect of being Cursed. If the disability is being infected with a disease, it's a Beneficial Disease. Handy Shortcoming is for those whose disability doesn't necessarily give them an immunity, but does become useful in situations.
 The idea that Idiots Cannot Catch Colds is a subtrope.
 Contrast Immunity Disability, the inverse of this trope, where being immune to something gives you a drawback.
"
Disability-Negating Superpower|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/DisabilityNegatingSuperpower|"A character who had previously lost one of their senses, limbs, or the ability to use any of the above gains some Stock Superpowers that, as a side effect, negate their disability while they are active. The drawback being, of course, that once the superpowers deactivate, the character goes right back to being physically handicapped (if they deactivate, anyway). The character may be a Henshin Hero or have a Superpowered Alter Ego to explain why they are still disabled part-time.
 Contrast Curse That Cures, where it's a negative effect (rather than a beneficial superpower) that also accidentally fixes a disability; Disability Superpower, where the character gains superpowers as a result of and/or in order to compensate for their disability; and Superpower Disability, where the character is actually disabled in some way by gaining superpowers. See also Disability Immunity, where a disability a character suffers actually protects them in some situations. See also Not Disabled In VR, where the disability doesn't exist in a virtual world.
 Because characters being permanently crippled, gaining superpowers or being miraculously cured are all usually plot-changing events, expect heavy spoilers.
"
Disability Superpower|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/DisabilitySuperpower|"A character is born with or acquires some handicap that prevents them from functioning normally. However, due to phlebotinum exposure or training, never mind Disability Immunity, they develop something that not only makes up for what's missing, but goes beyond it.
 Blindness seems to be a popular one for this. Indeed, the entire trope seems to be based around the idea that blind people's other senses become more acute to compensate. This does happen in real life but to a far weaker degree than the trope, simply because blind people get more exercise with paying close attention to their other senses, and the brain is capable of re-purposing unused spaces in the sensory and motor cortices. Some studies have indicated that people born deaf have better peripheral vision, as well.
 A realistic twist is for the power to have Logical Weaknesses, depending on the limitations of what the character uses to compensate for their disability. In less realistic examples, Disability Superpowers are so powerful that they negate the original disability entirely and/or so prevalent that no disabled people in the world are actually disabled. When Played for Drama, the character will still face Sense Loss Sadness over their disability despite any compensating. If lacking one or more familiar sensory modes in favor of something more exotic is the norm for a species, rather than an anomaly or the result of injury, that's Bizarre Alien Senses. If the power or ability the character gets is useful but doesn't quite make up for having a disability (usually the power/ability is a bit more mundane), that's Handy Shortcoming.
 Compare Keeping the Handicap for when a character decides that they'd rather stay disabled than become abled.
"
Disabled Character, Disabled Actor|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/DisabledCharacterDisabledActor|"This is about when a disabled person is cast for a role that has the same disability, rather than an able-bodied performer. For a long time in film, theater, and television, when a work called for a character with a disability, it was the norm to cast perfectly able-bodied actors in those roles, especially if the role was one of the leads (you still want to cast a big name star in the lead role, despite the character's disability, after all).
 It was so much the norm that casting disabled actors as disabled characters has only become more commonplace since the late 1980s, though normally such actors are in supporting or background roles. Disability activists in recent years have become more insistent on the importance of this kind of casting, pointing out how difficult it is for disabled actors to get roles at all, let alone when specifically disabled roles are being filled by able-bodied actors.
 While accommodations can be made, there are production and safety concerns where a non-disabled actor in such a role is justified. For example:
 Related to Cast the Expert. See Written-In Infirmity for cases where a performer became disabled during the run of a show and this was acknowledged in-universe, and Queer Character, Queer Actor for the LGBT Sister Trope.
"
Disabled Deity|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/DisabledDeity|"A Disabled Deity is a god or similar being who, despite the power and physical resilience that comes with divine status, is disabled in some way. Because of the obvious complications in even figuring out what would count as a disability to an entity like a Sentient Cosmic Force, this trope is generally applied to Physical Gods. This trope is Older Than Feudalism, dating back at least as far as Hephaestus in Classical Mythology. It's not uncommon for contemporary uses of this trope to be inspired by mythological figures.
 Somehow, using their godly powers to cure themselves never comes up as a viable option. Depending on how divine powers work in this setting, there may be a certain amount of Fridge Logic involved regarding why a being who can change shape or alter reality can't grow back a lost body part. This may be justified out-of-universe if the disability has symbolic significance or is part of the deity's ""theme"" (such as visual impairment for a god of knowledge, or a Red Right Hand for a God of Evil).
 This is for gods with physical disabilities, injuries, and such; for deities who are mentally ill or just not all there, see Mad God and Almighty Idiot. For gods that are not just disabled but completely broken up, see Pieces of God.
"
Disabled in the Adaptation|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/DisabledInTheAdaptation|"The reason for this differs from work to work. One reason could be because the adaptation's writers don't believe the characters should be so unscathed from their adventures. Another reason could be in order to provoke more drama. In the case of mental illness, this often (but not always) relates to an Adaptational Angst Upgrade, though it is by no means limited to it. ""Disabled AUs"" are a popular type of fan-work as a result. In some rarer cases, it is due to the actor chosen for the role being disabled in real life, causing it to be written into the story.
 The inversion would be Abled in the Adaptation. Sub-trope to Adaptational Diversity. Compare to Written-In Infirmity, when a character is given a specific disability because the actor portraying that character has the same condition.
"
Disabled Love Interest|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/DisabledLoveInterest|"Your studly, womanizing main man is walking down the school hall, and eyes a gorgeous woman he's never seen before. When he tries to start putting his moves on her, he finds out something.
 Or deaf, or has a prosthetic leg, or something like that. But don't worry, she'll still probably fall for him anyways.
 The Disabled Love Interest is a (usually temporary) Love Interest, most often Inspirationally Disadvantaged. She'll overcome her challenges in the end, and have a steamy kiss while she's at it. Homework question: Why is she usually only temporary? Unfortunate Implications indeed.
 Still, Tropes Are Tools. The love interest doesn't have to be Inspirationally Disadvantaged and can be a normal person with human thoughts and feelings, with Character Development. Moreover, the disability itself may serve as a romantic ""turn-on"" for the hero.
 See Also: Blind and the Beast, Delicate and Sickly, Handicapped Badass, and Florence Nightingale Effect. A downplayed version of the trope is a Speech-Impeded Love Interest.
"
Disabled Means Helpless|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/DisabledMeansHelpless|"When some people meet a person with a disability, they automatically assume that the individual is totally incapable of looking after themselves, and treat them as such. Most egregiously, some people even assume that having one disability equals having every disability! These people are the ones who insist on SHOUTING AT THE BLIND, assuming they can't hear, either. These patronizing attitudes often create resentment on the part of people with disabilities.
 In fiction, they have little problem telling the offender exactly that.
 Learning this is not true is often the point of a Very Special Episode. Contrast this trope to the Handicapped Badass, who everyone can instantly tell is not to be messed with. May lead to Unwanted Assistance.
"
Disabled Snarker|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/DisabledSnarker|"The disabled snarker is a character with some sort of disability and strong sarcastic tendencies that are linked in some way to their disability. This can be portrayed in a variety of ways  maybe they use snark as a coping mechanism or way to vent, maybe their position as a social outsider has given them an irreverent view of the world, or maybe the author is deliberately trying to avoid the Inspirationally Disadvantaged stereotype.
 Subtrope of Deadpan Snarker. Some teenage examples might overlap with Emo Teen. Compare Disability as an Excuse for Jerkassery; also compare Cuckoosnarker if a snarky character has a mental disability that is being used to portray them as having their head in the clouds.
 If the character is physically disabled, they may also be a Non-Action Snarker.
"
Dismemberment Is Cheap|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/DismembermentIsCheap|"In the real world, losing a limb is a life-altering event. There is the emotional trauma, the physical therapy, the newfound difficulty of simple tasks like walking or grabbing objects, the inevitable body image issues, and possibly a forced career change.
 Not so in this fictional universe. Through magic or advanced science, they have Artificial Limbs or cloned parts that are as good as (or better than) the original, or they're able to regrow lost limbs, just like a lizard. Dismemberment becomes a mere temporary inconvenience, even an opportunity to get an upgrade covered by health insurance.
 Presumably, it's a matter of time that this will become Truth in Television, as fully-functional prosthetic limbs and lab-produced biological organs are already taking their first steps.
 When a person (with no inherent healing powers) loses a limb and gets a replacement from doctors or healers with no loss of function and minimal angst, it's this trope. If the replacement is inferior to the originals or otherwise a burden or the recovery was grueling, the dismemberment wasn't exactly cheap, and if it turns out Cybernetics Eat Their Soul, that counts as life-altering too. If a character can shrug off limb loss because of their Healing Factor or Appendage Assimilation, it's a Good Thing You Can Heal. If they have or gain superpowers that make up for their new disability, it's a Disability Superpower or We Can Rebuild Him.
 See also Death Is Cheap, Immortal Life Is Cheap, Plug 'n' Play Prosthetics. Like those tropes, it's a way to show things are serious without having to significantly alter the course of your characters' lives.
"
Dream-Crushing Handicap|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/DreamCrushingHandicap|"The stock drama in which someone's aspirations are impossible because of a physical defect. Used for comedy and dark comedy just as much as it is for drama. This is often a crucial turning point in a story, so be warned that there are spoilers below.
 Related to I Coulda Been a Contender!. Subversions and aversions can lead to a Handicapped Badass. Inversions can be Inspirationally Disadvantaged or have a Disability Superpower. If the character gains the defect during their life, then it's a Career-Ending Injury. If they're too much of a Determinator to let their handicap stop them, they may become a Deaf Composer or Ironically Disabled Artist.
 Sister Trope to Tragic Dream, where the aspiration is impossible due to any of a number of things.
 Not to Be Confused with All of the Other Reindeer.
"
Dwarfism in Media|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/DwarfismInMedia|"Media that depict people with dwarfism, also commonly known as dwarfs or little people. Dwarfism refers to height shorter than 410/147 cm, specifically as a symptom of a medical condition (short stature not caused by a medical condition generally isn't considered dwarfism). A distinction is often made between disproportionate dwarfism (in which either the limbs or torso is atypically small) and proportionate dwarfism (in which the entire body is small, resulting in proportions like those of someone without dwarfism but scaled down). Historically, people with disproportionate dwarfism were known as ""dwarfs"" and people with proportionate dwarfism were known as ""midgets"", but nowadays the latter term is considered pejorative. Media depictions of dwarfism have traditionally tended to fall under either Little People Are Surreal or Depraved Dwarf, at least when actors with dwarfism aren't playing aliens or fantasy creatures. More recently, though, depictions of such conditions have become more nuanced.
 Not to be confused with the stock fantasy creatures known as dwarves (note the different spelling), for which see Our Dwarves Are All the Same.
"
Eunuchs Are Evil|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/EunuchsAreEvil|"So you've got a villain and you've got to give him a Red Right Hand, and your protagonist is the manliest of men. So, why not make your villain a Foil and remove his male gonads? Especially prevalent in fantasy and historical fiction, the Evil Eunuch is simultaneously creepy and effeminatethink Sissy Villain meets Virgin-Shaming. Since testosterone increases muscle gain, a villainous eunuch's lack of testosterone makes him unlikely to have a Heroic Build. Instead, he tends to be either a Fat Bastard (especially since castration also decreases metabolism and energy levels, hence the Lazy Neutered Pet) or Lean and Mean. Eunuchs also tend to have less bodily and facial hair than intact men do, which lends itself well to comparisons to reptiles. Throw in a Creepy High-Pitched Voice notealong with Creepy Long Fingers and Creepily Long Arms (and long legs, which tends to overlap with Evil Is Bigger) if the writer is going for accuracy if he was castrated before puberty, and you've got a great recipe for an Obviously Evil foe. And of course, the limited sex drive makes this trope likely to overlap with the No Love for the Wicked.
 Eunuchs tend to be Evil Chancellor types, in keeping with the myriad historical records of ruthless and power-hungry eunuchs in societies like the Byzantine Empire, Ottoman Turkey, and Imperial China. These empires appointed eunuchs to key court positions under the assumption that since they couldn't have children, they'd be more inclined to serve the good of the empire instead of trying to accumulate power for their families (which was an especially important factor in places like Byzantium and China, where usurpers who aimed to start their own imperial dynasties weren't uncommon). As it turned out, the lack of a family to enrich didn't stop eunuchs from seeking to enrich themselves, and in fact, gave them that much more time to scheme and plot, and that much less incentive to ensure they didn't destabilize the empire for future generations. So employing eunuchs didn't do much to solve the problem, and in some ways made it worse. Meanwhile in post-Roman Europe (""Roman"" here encompassing the Byzantine, or more properly Eastern Roman, Empire) or a setting based thereon, if a eunuch appears in a Period Piece, he's likely a castrato singer who behaves not unlike the usual Prima Donna celebrity.
 If a villain like this has supernatural powers, it could overlap with Virgin Power and Disability Superpower. Failing to avert the fate of the very castration that the animal so feared can be the Freudian Excuse for animal examples of this trope. Many, but not all male examples are Sissy Villains. It may or may not overlap with Pure Is Not Good: a villainous eunuch may be characterised as pure due to his lack of sexual development,notethough in some cases, sex can still occur after castration or as impure due to his physical mutilation. This type of character frequently has an Effeminate Voice.
 This trope is mostly, but not exclusively male. This trope is not restricted to castrations, both surgical and chemical. Penectomy and ovariohysterectomy examples can be included as well.
 Compare Evil Cripple and Depraved Dwarf. Oh, and this trope has nothing to do with Unix outside of puns.
"
Evil Cripple|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/EvilCripple|"An Evil Cripple is a villain or generally morally perturbed character who also suffers a debilitating physical condition, often taking the form of paralysis requiring the use of a wheelchair. The Evil Cripple doubles as the Genius Cripple a lot, providing an intellectual threat to compensate for their physical frailty. Alternatively, the Evil Cripple can become a physical threat if they use futuristic enhancements to overcome their disability, such as replacing missing or defective limbs with super-strong Powered Armor or cybernetic parts.
 The first is rooted in eugenics-based ideas linking disability or other physical deformities with a ""natural"" predisposition towards madness, criminality, vice, etc. The Rule of Symbolism is often at work here, since a ""crippled"" body can be used to represent a ""crippled"" soul  and indeed, a disabled villain is usually put in contrast to a morally upright and physically ""perfect"" hero. Whether consciously on the part of the writer or not, this can reinforce cultural ideas of disability making a person inherently inferior or negative, much in the same way the Sissy Villain or Depraved Homosexual associate sexual and gender nonconformity with evil.
 In some stories, especially those featuring superheroes, the contrast between a hero with super strength and a villain who is physically handicapped and instead relies on his brainpower plays on the archetype of brain vs. brawn. It also provides a buffer against the standard ""solution"" of punching the bad guy out since the hero would look pretty low hitting a cripple compared to an able-bodied villain. These stories also tend to feature a Freudian Excuse in the villain's backgroundeither trauma from an accident, or, if they were born disabled, envy of the able-bodied, that is the cause of their hatred for the world.
 Many villainous pirates have Hook Hands, Seadog Peg Legs, and Eyepatches of Power, though this may simply be to reinforce their badassery, a case of Handicapped Badass rather than Evil Cripple as these things are rarely shown to handicap them much. These attributes seem to be cases of Follow the Leader; the Seadog Peg Leg originated with Long John Silver of Treasure Island and the Hook Hand with Captain Hook of Peter Pan, and later writers just based their pirates on these guys.
 A common subversion of this trope is when the character is revealed to not actually be crippled, leading to a Throwing Off the Disability scene, but was exploiting that image to maintain a cover or give the illusion of helplessness. Given that, some of these examples contain spoilers.
 This trope may overlap with Handicapped Badass in the case of particularly powerful crippled baddies, and with Dark Lord on Life Support in particularly extreme examples. See Mental Handicap, Moral Deficiency for villains who are intellectually rather than physically disabled. See also Depraved Dwarf; Eunuchs Are Evil; Hook Hand; Red Right Hand; Good Prosthetic, Evil Prosthetic; Good Scars, Evil Scars; Disability as an Excuse for Jerkassery; Four Eyes, Zero Soul.
"
Eyepatch of Power|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/EyepatchOfPower|"Something covers one of the character's eyes. It might be an eyepatch, a particularly concealing haircut, or a tilted hachimaki. Whatever it is, and however it came to be, through Fashionable Asymmetry it neatly conveys the fact that the wearer is either 1) an experienced combatant or 2) secretly a badass.
 These characters rarely experience any problems with depth perception or suffer from the resulting reduced field of vision. In fact, sometimes the Eyepatch of Power covers a perfectly functional  or specially functional  eye instead of the empty hole one might suspect. This is sometimes a technique of The Trickster. Main characters will often gain an eyepatch as a Future Badass or Evil Twin.
 Pirates often have eye patches as a Stock Costume Trait, which is a separate thematic concept  see Dressed to Plunder  but the overlap of badassery and piracy is significant enough to mention. This is partially Truth in Television, pirates in real life did often wear eye patches regularly, but mainly because on sailing ships in the 18th century there were over a thousand different ways one could lose body parts, including eyes (this is also the reason why hooks for hands and peg legs are commonly associated with them as well, seeing as such items could easily be improvised using materials already on a ship to compensate for missing limbs). In this case, sailors didn't wear eye patches to look tough so much as they did because on average people have an easier time looking at a piece of cloth over one eye than at the scarred tissue where the eye used to be. Furthermore, even pirates (and other seamen) with two functioning eyes were wont to wear eyepatches: since it's so dark belowdecks, having one eye always in darkness made it easier to adjust.
 In The Future, rough and tumble outlaws will often have a single, obvious cybernetic eye which will give them some sort of special holdout ability or Super Senses.
 When the Norse god Odin traded an eye for a drink from Mimir's well of knowledge, he made this trope Older Than Print.
 Related to Blind Seerpower gain through the loss of an eye is a repeating motif in literature, like the Odin example above.
 See also: Magical Eye, Mask Power, Eyes Always Shut, and if you're masochistic, Eye Scream. For characters that weren't wearing it the last time you saw them, see Eyepatch After Time Skip. See also Blindfolded Vision, where a blindfolded combatant is no worse off (or better!) than their opponents. May result because Scars are Forever.
"
Fictional Disability|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/FictionalDisability|"


This trope covers characters who have some sort of disability that doesn't exist in the real world. This can include, but is by no means limited to:
 This can still include conditions that end up being a Disability Superpower or Disability Immunity, as long as the condition itself is still debilitating.
 This trope can be used as a way to write disabled characters in settings where most real-life disabilities would be rendered uncommon as a result of magic or advanced technology, or to explore the social consequences of said magic and technology existing (although this can lead to a Space Whale Aesop; ""Don't invent faster computers or people will lose the ability to eat plant matter!""). Cyberpunk and other social science fiction settings love using both variations, since including characters who can't benefit from the technology is a fascinating way of analysing its effect on society.
 Super-Trope to Un-Sorcerer (whose disability is the lack of a setting's ubiquitous super powers), Science-Related Memetic Disorder (where being a Mad Scientist is treated as a disorder), Abnormal Allergy (an allergy that is not possible in real life), and Superpower Disability (where the drawbacks of a superpower are so severe they qualify as a disability)  examples of which belong on their respective pages. Compare Kryptonite Factor and Power Incontinence, which can be combined with this trope, and Neurodiversity Is Supernatural, where mental disorders are given fictional supernatural origins.
"
Flipping Helpless|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/FlippingHelpless|"A common Weaksauce Weakness is flipping something or someone on their back. While it is possible to reorient, it usually takes a significant amount of wobbling to do so, leaving one vulnerable.
 In video games, this is very effective against Stone Wall enemies, especially shelled ones.
 A problem that tends to happens to turtles and tortoises (and Bender) from time to time.
"
Forgot the Disability|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/ForgotTheDisability|"Many disabled people have lived with their handicaps for a very long time, and thus would usually develop a means of coping in a way where they appear ""normal."" Sometimes this applies naturally, like a blind person using all of their other senses to the point where they forget that they are blind. In most cases (and because it's cool), the trope usually applies to someone who uses superpowers to compensate, like getting around with levitation despite being paralyzed.
 Because of this, running gags and moments of awkward silence are born from the times when the characters around them are suddenly reminded that one is disabled.
 Compare with You Know I'm Black, Right?; contrast with Ignore the Disability.
"
The Freakshow|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/TheFreakshow|"A sideshow act is a special show that involves people with strange or dangerous talents, and people with odd physical deformities or features.
 Sideshows can serve as interesting origin stories for characters. They can also be a hiding place for characters who genuinely aren't human or have supernatural powers to hide themselves in plain sight. After all, a traveling circus is just the place for an outcast to fit in without having to put down roots in a town.
 At times, sideshow performers tend to be treated badly by the owners of the traveling circus or carnival. They often are paid little, abused, overworked, and dehumanized. They are gawked at by circus-goers and treated as a spectacle. In real life, however, outright abusive management was much less common than in fiction - many wiser sideshow owners recognised that without their acts they had no income, and dealt with them more fairly. (A notable example of both is the real case of Joseph ""The Elephant Man"" Merrick: his London manager Tom Norman paid him well and treated him with respect, contrary to the Historical Villain Upgrade he gets in many dramatisations, but a subsequent manager stole his money and dumped him alone and penniless in the Netherlands.)
 Compare Circus of Fear; some ""sideshow freaks"" are not exactly the nicest guys, and may be very dangerous. (Having people taunting and staring at you all day long because of some aspect of your appearance or an unusual talent you have is stressful.) Watch your step. Not to be confused with Carnival of Killers, however, which is different.
 Also compare Come to Gawk, which comes up frequently in works about freak shows, as well as the Point-and-Laugh Show, which is the TV version of this trope. The Barnum is likely to be running these shows. Not to be confused with Sideshow Bob of The Simpsons infamy, who's freaky in a different way.
"
Genius Cripple|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/GeniusCripple|"In the world of fiction, physical impairment = scientific credibility. The world is actually an RPG Mechanics 'Verse, and when this Munchkin rolled up their character, they were Min-Maxing. Anyone in a wheelchair will possess super intelligence to compensate for his disability. This allows the character to remain a vital part of the cast without being expected to do anything physical. They are the exact opposite of Dumb Muscle, which exist on the same principle.
 A form of Disability Superpower. See also Evil Cripple for when a Genius Cripple turns out to be evil.
 Examples will often be a Squishy Wizard, Blind Musician, Blind Seer, or Deaf Composer. See also Ironically Disabled Artist, when physical impairment doesn't stop creative skill (as opposed to brains). Also compare Handicapped Badass for the physical counterpart of this trope, and Genius Bruiser if both tropes overlap with each other. Sickly Neurotic Geek and Geek Physiques can be similar to downplayed versions of this trope.
"
Glass Eye|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/GlassEye|"Glass Eyes are effectively a slightly more technologically advanced version of the eyepatch but without some of the pirate overtones. So they often get the overtones of the Eyepatch of Power. This particularly happens if the glass eye is designed to not match the other eye.
 However, another common use of the Glass Eye is for comedy. The eye ends up being ill-fitting, constantly rolls around in the head, perhaps falls out and rolls around on the floor, leading to some slapstick runaround. A common variation for comedy purposes is to make the eyes wooden. It's just inherently funnier somehow, though you might get the common courtesy of a joke where the wooden eye is going along with a pirate's wooden legs and wooden arms and wooden... other bits. Mention must also go to the common joke format of Ignore the Disability, where people take great pains to try to not stare at the deformity.
 See also Electronic Eyes for when the concept gets a futuristic upgrade with some more exotic connotations.
"
Good Prosthetic, Evil Prosthetic|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/GoodProstheticEvilProsthetic|"You can tell how good The Hero or bad the Villain is by how deep their scars were cut. Take it a few steps further and then imagine the kind of stories one can tell when they're missing a leg. Or two.
 Artificial Limbs are commonly given to amputees to help them function pragmatically and to give them a sense of normalcy. Prosthetics can range from simple wooden legs and hook-hands, to robotic arms to even fully-functioning clone limbs made of artificial plasma-gel.
 Heroic types usually try to make their arms and legs look similar to their original ones. If they could not put artificial skin of some kind on it, they at least try to make it look as unrobotic and nonthreatening as possible. Bad guys on the other hand try to make their robot arms and legs as bulky and obvious as possible, showing it off to show that they will NOT be a victim again, not unlike how one would brandish a gun in their belt to intimidate. At times they could even see their non-robotic components as a weakness, losing more and more of their humanity as they replace their bodies with soulless tech. Some really nasty types have artificial limbs with permanently-installed weaponry.
 Another related pattern is how the character got the augments in the first place. Almost always the Good Prosthetic was installed either because of the medical necessity (replacing a missing arm) or without the consent of the recipient, while all cases of voluntary cybernetic enhancements result in Evil Prosthetic and are treated as the morally wrong thing to do and a slippery slope to even more body modifications.
 Character Alignment may also depend on how they lost their limbs in the first place. They could have lost their legs saving a child from a drunk-driven truck, losing their eye trying to rob some old lady, or something as simple as losing a finger or five in the garbage disposal.
"
The Grotesque|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/TheGrotesque|"A character that induces both fear and pity in viewers because his deformities belie a perfectly normal  if not noble  personality. The pathos associated with The Grotesque is the implication that he could easily have been a well-adjusted member of society if not for the hideousness that he is powerless to remedy.
 He is very rarely presented as the villain and frequently overlaps with the Reluctant Monster and Tragic Hero. The defining trait of The Grotesque is that his hideous appearance belies a gentle personality that is doomed to mistreatment because of society's shallowness. We, the viewers, are left feeling like the only ones who can see him for who he truly is, and want to comfort him with the knowledge that he's not alone in his quiet suffering.
 The Grotesque does not necessarily have to be physically deformed; he can be mentally or socially deformed, so long as we continue to see the good within and wish that it can somehow overcome the badness masking it.
 Don't expect any of that to allow someone this ugly to get a happy ending. Grotesques are universally tragic characters.
 Contrast Red Right Hand, where the outer deformity is symbolic of an inner corruption. Not to be confused with the kind of ""grotesque"" that adorns old gothic rooftops  see Our Gargoyles Rock. Compare Gentle Giant (where a person is seemingly intimidating due to their size even though they're really sweet), Misunderstood Loner with a Heart of Gold (where the Loners Are Freaks stigma kicks in but they're actually not so bad once you get to know them), and Face of a Thug (Like Gentle Giant but it's their face instead). May result from a Power-Upgrading Deformation.
"
Handicapped Badass|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/HandicappedBadass|"How can you make a Badass character even more badass? Easy; make him lose an eye, or have her get paralyzed from the waist down, or give them some disease from which there is no cure. Finally, do not use the Reset Button to remove it. ""What?!"" you say, ""My character must stay injured/handicapped?"" Simply, yes.
 In Real Life, we know how hard it is to accomplish death-defying feats in perfect health and condition, so anybody that does it with a disability instantly earns our respect. Imagine how much more awesome that shoot-out is going to be when the audience finds out The Hero is blind. Imagine the buzz your character will get when they win the judo competition with just one good leg.
 It is important that your character's conquest of their physical challenge makes sense; not properly explaining their ability to continue to function, let alone on the badass level, will result in audience confusion, or worse, your character becoming a Sympathetic Sue.
 For the sake of the story, a restrained dose of Applied Phlebotinum is allowed to explain or aid the character's ability to overcome the handicap. This technological or otherwise nonstandard aid cannot completely cure or nullify the effects of the injury, though  that would kill the point of the character triumphing over the handicap. Thus, The Six Million Dollar Man wouldn't count. On the other hand, if the helping device has drawbacks that constantly remind the character of their issue, that's cool. For example, in Star Wars, Darth Vader's life support suit enables him to kick ass despite his extensive and debilitating injuries, but it's clunky and outdated by the standards of The 'Verse. Vader can't survive without it, and he still has to endure the constant pain of his old injuries (along with the incessant Vader Breath from that noisy respirator).
 Some writers will go for extra points by showing how an injury unlocked the character's true potential by causing them to discover some heretofore unrealized skill or ability or learning a new one. A Training Montage might be in order to show how the character learned to overcome the handicap. If a person has powers because they are disabled, then that's a Disability Superpower. The Deaf Composer may go through a similar process regarding their chosen craft.
 Mental challenges, such as autism spectrum disorder and PTSD, count as well. Old age doesn't (although it often overlaps with this trope), as that's already covered by tropes like Never Mess with Granny and Old Master.
 This trope is commonly seen among fictional pirates. These attributes seem to be cases of Follow the Leader: the Seadog Peg Leg originated with Long John Silver of Treasure Island,notealthough in the book he had a crutch, not a peg the Hook Hand with Captain Hook of Peter Pan, and the Eyepatch of Power well, that might have come from Real Life Arab pirate Rahmah ibn Jabir al-Jalahimah, but it might also come from something that has nothing to do with disabilities. Some people have speculated that sailors wore eyepatches to keep one eye in the dark, so when they went into the darkness below deck, they'd have one eye accustomed to the darkness, and they'd just switch the patch to the other eye.
 Specific Sub-Tropes include Blind Weaponmaster, Blind Seer, and Deaf Composer. The Blind Black Guy usually fits this trope (and is usually based at least partially on Ray Charles or Stevie Wonder). In the case of a villainous Handicapped Badass, like the aforementioned Vader, Silver, and Hook, this trope will also overlap with Evil Cripple.
 This trope is often seen in Real Life among people who don't accept the Dream-Crushing Handicap as the final word. Of course, not everyone wants to follow this trope and be ""inspirational"". Instead, they'd rather go about their lives, maybe with (God forbid) a few accommodations. On the bright side, at least it isn't vomit-inducing pity. Compare Pregnant Badass. On the more intelligent side, compare Genius Cripple, and if both of these tropes overlap with each other, you'll get Genius Bruiser. Contrast this trope to Disabled Means Helpless.
"
Handy Helper|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/HandyHelper|"Alice has a handicap or deformity. And we're not talking inspirationally or awesomely disabled here. We're not playing it for quirkiness or to make her stand out. This disability is a genuine handicap which makes Alice's life harder, and perhaps even affects her self-image and sense of worth. For purposes of illustration, let's say Alice has no hands.
 Bob loves Alice, and is dismayed by her sadness over her handicap. So Bob takes Alice's face tenderly in his hands and tenderly tells her ""Do not worry, I will be your hands.""
 And Bob makes good on his promise. Bob feeds Alice, he applies her make-up, he writes her letters, dresses her. Hell, he becomes so familiar with Alice's quirks and behavior that he can even anticipate her, cupping her mouth when she yawns, holding a finger to her nose when she's about to sneeze, scratching her where she itches before she even tells him.
 This trope is a character compensating for another character's disability or deformity by basically becoming the appendage the other person is lacking (or, in cases like Cumbersome Claws, an appendage hard to use for other reasons). This altruistic attitude is usually attributed to, at least, a bond of friendship, and often is borne out of genuine love, be it brotherly, parent-child or romantic. There are also situations where both characters are disabled in different ways and serve as this to each other.
 Compare The Caretaker. Not to be confused with Helping Hands (although it's entirely possible for Helping Hands to be a Handy Helper). Voice for the Voiceless is a specific variant when the handicap is muteness.
"
Hiding the Handicap|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/HidingTheHandicap|"Having a disability can change the way some people view you as a person. But what if you don't want people to change their image of you?
 Hiding the Handicap is when a character with a disability or other type of affliction chooses to hide that fact. Reasons for doing this can vary: maybe the character in question believes they can't afford to be seen as ""weak"", maybe they're afraid of being mocked or pitied, or perhaps they'd no longer be allowed to do something if certain people found out. Can overlap with Secretly Dying, if the character has a debilitating mortal injury.
 Secret Stab Wound and Feigning Healthiness are short-term versions. Contrast Obfuscating Disability and I Am Not Left-Handed. A subtrope to Clothing-Concealed Injury, where clothing is used to hide the handicap.
"
Hollywood Autism|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/HollywoodAutism|"In Real Life, autism (now officially referred to in the DSM as Autism Spectrum Condition, or ASC) is a complex spectrum of forms of neurodiversity that can affect an autistic individual's social interactions, among other areas as detailed in our Useful Notes for Asperger Syndrome and Autism.
 Many autistic people are quite knowledgeable about certain subjects about which they are passionate, termed special interests. In spite of most Hollywood portrayals displaying autistic people as being gifted in math or science or music, the interests and talents of real-life autistic people vary. Not all autistic people have one specific area of talent or interest  some are quite the Renaissance people. Additionally, in most cases, any talents an autistic person has is the result of constant passion and practice  same as any neurotypical person  rather than being inherited excellence (Autistic savants do exist, but as of 2009, only take up 10% of the autistic population at most).
 While there are more males than females diagnosed with autism, there are plenty of autistic females out there. Research shows that autism presents in all sexes at a relatively even rate, merely being more apparent in males due to the ""only men can have autism"" attitude. Autism lasts forever, and there are countless autistic adults who work, go to college, live on their own, and have healthy relationships. Furthermore, autistic people in Real Life are, well, actually real autistic people.
 In contrast, the stereotypical representation of autism, called Hollywood Autism, which is most likely to be portrayed as a white, cisgender, heterosexual male noteCenters for Disease Control and Prevention postulates ""socioeconomic or other barriers"" may impede diagnosis in some communities, possessing a beanpole build, and by an allistic - or non-autistic - person, especially in Live-Action TV and Film and characters on the lower-functioning part of the spectrum (for logistical reasons). It is most common for an autistic character to be a child and if he is an adult, he's most likely to be the Idiot Savant, a creep, or simply a manchild.
 He is portrayed as almost completely lacking emotions, empathy, and compassion. He either doesn't talk a lot or talks too much. Folks in his life think he's boring, annoying, nerdy, weird, or even creepy. Additionally, he is totally unable to live what most people would call a normal life and is ultimately a burden on those around him. They are also portrayed by actors, ones who probably weren't picked for being autistic, or, considering the accuracy of their portrayal, knowing an autistic person.
 Most controversially, their lives are rarely depicted as being as fulfilling or as much of a life as that of someone who is not autistic, although there have been more examples of autistic adults in media whose lives are depicted as non-tragic and even find romance and have children but they are still far rarer than examples of children and adults whose autism is shown as tragic. Finally, due to the overwhelming attitude that autism is automatically a tragedy in all cases rather than a different way of being or a disability that can be lived with and managed, it is common for an autistic character to miraculously be cured of his autism, usually through Applied Phlebotinum.note Autisms nature as a developmental disorder means its impossible to cure short of going back in time and changing how the brain develops, with current medicine. This is especially controversial in the autistic community and supporters of them given that some truly horrific attempts to cure them have been done. In some cases, they've literally been ruled to be torture. While commonalities between most individuals do exist, real-life autism is much more complex than how this trope portrays it, branching out in a wide variety of ways from person to person, making this trope's Truth in Television status too questionable for real-life examples.
 Characters with Hollywood Autism are commonly Literal-Minded and may be Insufferable Geniuses. Not only do they get really into their interests, but these interests tend to be something no neurotypical/allistic person would ever be interested in, like naming every piece of a train engine or every station on a given line. In contrast, they will often show zero interest in sex, relationships, sports, and other ""normal"" mainstream interests. This character may also be a Cloudcuckoolander or have Attention Deficit... Ooh, Shiny!.
 If this type of character has Animal Motifs, they're often associated with catsnoteThis is a point of comparison that many autistic people and autism rights advocates actually endorse, owing to the bevy of behavioral similarities between cats and what is common among autistic individuals (including stimming, special interests, adherence to routines, sensory sensitivity, and highly subtle and easily misunderstood/overpathologized body language) to the point where the cat has become an unofficial mascot of sorts for the autism rights movement.
 Expect him to be Inspirationally Disadvantaged or for his Hollywood Autism to be a Disability Superpower. He might also be part of a Five-Token Band, if he's being portrayed as the brains of the group or the token disabled character, and may even vacillate between one and the other. The difficulties inherent in depicting autism and other neurodiverse conditions is one reason for the popularity of not specifying the condition, which gives creators more leeway in interpretation.
 If those characters were to be diagnosed according to DSM-5 criteria, most of them would probably get an ASD Level 2 (""Requiring substantial support"") diagnosisnoteor even Level 3 (""Requiring very substantial support""), if they're shown as mostly non-verbal or with some form of cognitive impairment, with ASD Level 1 (""Requiring support"") possibly matching some more downplayed examples. However, one can perfectly be a Level 2 or even Level 3 without being a stereotype of autism, nor, by definition, being an inaccurate portrayal.
"
Hollywood Tourette's|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/HollywoodTourettes|"Like all neurological conditions, Tourette's Syndrome is a complicated and variable disorder that can manifest itself in many different ways. And like most neurological conditions, this is not the case on TV.
 In real life, Tourette's Syndrome is characterized by involuntary ""tics"" that the person feels compelled to perform fairly regularly; depending on the severity, this can range from an easily-suppressed thought to actions so uncontrollable that it makes Adrian Monk seem perfectly normal. To be categorized by a psychiatrist as Tourette's (instead of a related disorder), the sufferer must have multiple physical tics or at least one Verbal Tic. These tics can range from something small like uncontrollable breathing patterns or involuntarily pulling a face to hand movements and gestures to specific words. Around 10% of people with Tourette's also display something called ""coprolalia"" (derived from Greek, literally meaning shit-talking), which is the involuntary uttering of socially unacceptable things.
 In TV land, though, Tourette's Syndrome is coprolalia. In most people's minds, Tourette's is a condition where people fire Cluster F Bombs upon Cluster F Bombs and nothing more. It makes sense that this is how it would be treated  it gives the writers the chance for a Very Special Episode about accepting others even if they are different... and the chance to Cross The Line Twice with really, really dirty language.
 The kind of things people ""with Tourette's"" say on TV and in movies varies significantly depending on the medium and culture. American TV tends to avoid f-bombs and really strong profanity, though cable can be a little stronger. ""Ass"" is more common, as are other naughty parts of the body. Obscene words for women are usually out so as to avoid being accused of sexism, but milder words are usually cool.
 Ethnic and racial slurs are usually out to avoid being racist (except when a person accidentally blurts out the n-word in a room full of black people, and hilarity theoretically ensues). Slurs like ""queer"" have traditionally been fair game, but more recently this has been on the down slide to avoid homophobia. Foreign swears have always been very popular, as they enable a person to use much stronger language, as the audience (and the censors) won't be as likely to understand their severity.
 Very mild swears like ""damn"" and ""hell"" are usually not used, unless to signify how lame the person with Tourette's is. Compound swears generally fall under the rules for the worst swear making up the compound. The exception to this being compounds that alter the nature of the swear. Of course, this varies.
 And occasionally, a show might just even feature a person with Tourette's who doesn't swear. (An episode of 20/20 profiled a real-life sufferer who said things like ""Help! My underwear's on fire!"")
 Note that coprolalia does not occur in writing (or typing). Most moderators of major chatrooms are in fact aware of this.
"
Hook Hand|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/HookHand|"A character replaces their hand with a hook or similar object. Bonus points if a crocodile is somehow involved.
 This is an example of Fashionable Asymmetry, subtrope of Artificial Limbs, and is one of the stereotypical attributes of pirates. In most fiction, someone who uses one of these is probably evil, although exceptions are possible. More generally, it serves as a Red Right Hand, though such uses may have reached a Dead Horse Trope level. Such an individual will invariably be Dressed to Plunder.
 See also Hooks and Crooks. Seadog Peg Leg is a sister trope. Can overlap with Ironically Disabled Artist if a one-handed musician uses a hook to play an instrument.
"
I Can't Feel My Legs!|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/ICantFeelMyLegs|"A big battle is going on, and one of the good guys gets injured. Usually, it's not a main character, but rather a secondary one who utters the phrase ""I can't feel my legs..."". When this comes out of their mouth, you know that they're going to end up paralyzed in some way (usually for life). This is a common backstory for the Inspirationally Disadvantaged, Wheelchair Woobie, or someone with a Disability Superpower.
 This trope is usually a spoiler, as well as a Stock Phrase.
 This trope is Played for Laughs a lot nowadays, sometimes with the character saying ""I can't feel my legs"" already being disabled, and somebody reminding them that they couldn't before. Alternatively they may say the words, then a few seconds later realise that they can, and it's agonising. Another variant is the person thinking they're touching their own legs with their hands, getting worried when it doesn't cause a feeling in their legs, then being told they're touching something else (usually someone else's legs). For a related comedic trope, where this situation is Played For Slapstick, see Bits of Me Keep Passing Out.
"
Ignore the Disability|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/IgnoreTheDisability|"The cast is about to meet an important person with a peculiarity or disability, such as a wooden leg or an extraordinarily large nose. One of the cast who is in a position of authority exhorts the others not to comment on the guest's unusual feature, lest the guest take it as an insult.
 When the guest arrives, some member or members of the castusually children or ditzescome close to commenting, but to the relief of the exhorting character, they say nothing. But as soon as they are out of sight, the character then turns to the guest and blurts a Freudian Slip that delivers the very insult he was afraid the others would give.
 This is merely the television version of a much older joke; Louis Untermeyer's 1946 humor anthology A Treasury of Laughter includes a version dating to the 1930s (if not earlier) casting 19th-century financier J.P. Morgan (and his prominent nose) as the guest, a young Anne Morrow (the future Mrs. Charles Lindbergh) as the exhorted child, and Morrow's mother as the authority figure who embarrasses herself.
 Compare Forgot the Disability, Freudian Slippery Slope and Thought-Aversion Failure. May overlap with Thinks of Something Smart, Says Something Stupid if the character is mentally reminding themself to not mention some awkward topic, only to blurt it out as soon as they open their mouth.
"
Informed Deformity|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/InformedDeformity|"The physical equivalent of an Informed Attribute and often a subset of the Informed Flaw. A character who is not different in any discernible way from the rest of the cast is found by them to be freakish in some way that should normally be obvious to the audience.
 Distinct from Take Our Word for It in that the sight the cast is reacting to is still actually shown. This can be done deliberately if you want to get all meta about it. On the flip side, even very extensive scarring done too realistically may be barely visible on camera.
 In animated or drawn media, it might be the result of Generic Cuteness, Only Six Faces, or both. Hollywood Homely and Informed Attractiveness are subtropes. The inversion, where nobody notices a character's actual deformity, is an Unusually Uninteresting Sight.
 A Sub-Trope of Show, Don't Tell. Also see Minor Injury Overreaction.
"
Inspirationally Disadvantaged|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/InspirationallyDisadvantaged|"A.k.a. the Magical Disabled Person (to go with Magical Negro, Magical Asian, Magical Queer, Magical Native American, and all their outdated magical friends).
 Sometimes a Girl of the Week (in which case, see also Disabled Love Interest) or part of a Very Special Episode or Made-for-TV Movie, the Inspirationally Disadvantaged Person superficially appears weak or downtrodden but has hidden reserves of strength which often results in An Aesop.
 Patronizing:
A lot of the time, especially in the Sitcom, the Inspirationally Disadvantaged person's reserves of strength are applied to doing some perfectly ordinary task such as competing in the school talent show, graduating, or going on a date. It's only elevated to the heights of heroism because the person doing it is ""differently abled"".
 Advocacy groups have spoken out against the practice, since it's more than a little patronizing to portray a disabled person as heroic for doing something the rest of us do all the time - comparable to You Are a Credit to Your Race. That's one reason that this trope is a lot less common than it used to be, though a few shows that aren't afraid of a little Glurge still do it from time to time. It's also been noted that people seem to like to shower actors who portray these kind of characters with awards, thus prompting more than a little cynicism about the motives of actors who take on these roles.
 The late Australian disability activist Stella Young referred to this as ""inspiration porn,"" as it can be seen as a way of objectifying people with disabilities to make non-disabled individuals feel good. Her TED talk on the subject can be found here.
 Superpowered:
Disparagingly known as the ""super-crip"" by disabled people, these are characters with disabilities shown as going above and beyond the level of even non-disabled people in spite of their disabilities. This has led to the belief that a wheelchair user should be training for the Paralympics or a Genius Cripple, the mentally handicapped and blind should be practicing to be famous artists, and that having clinical depression should turn you into an awesome writer. In some cases, the character turns out to have a special talent or skill that no other character can beat, sometimes implicitly ""making up"" for the disability, sometimes bordering on Disability Superpower. In certain cases, the story goes out of its way to paint the handicap as a good/bad thing that influences (or is influenced by) the character's capacity to interact with whatever magic is in the setting, meaning that Neurodiversity Is Supernatural.
 While it's certainly an improvement on pity, it can get irritating since most disabled people really just want to get on with relatively normal lives, with maybe a few accommodations like ramps, appropriate medication, and as little patronising as possible.
 Magical:
This Inspirationally Disadvantaged person is of the Magical kind, with shades of Incorruptible Pure Pureness. This flavor of Inspirationally Disadvantaged is there to be a good influence and teach the non-disabled lead, who is often white and male (but with some exceptions), a Very Special Lesson. Quite often, the person who is Magically Inspirationally Disadvantaged is Too Good for This Sinful Earth.
 All types are seen as exploitative, with disabled characters often being little more than gimmicks to tug the heartstrings of able-bodied and able-minded viewers and make them feel ""inspired"" without actually challenging them to do anything about the systems that make life so difficult for the disabled in the first place, objectifying actual disabled people (hence the reason why disabled people refer to this trope as ""inspiration porn""). In addition, the trope is so well known that many people slap ANY disabled character with the label regardless of how they're portrayed.
 See also Idiot Savant, Waif Prophet, Ironically Disabled Artist and its subtrope Deaf Composer, and Whoopi Epiphany Speech. Dream-Crushing Handicap and Wheelchair Woobie are essentially inversions of this trope. Also somewhat related to Littlest Cancer Patient. Can result in Glurge if handled poorly. Compare Graceful in Their Element, contrast Evil Cripple.
"
Ironically Disabled Artist|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/IronicallyDisabledArtist|"Fiction loves juxtaposition, and so in fiction, you're likely to come across a character with a disability at odds with their art, like a one-handed pianist, a colorblind painter, or a one-legged dancer.
 May be used to show them as Inspirationally Disadvantaged, portraying them as having to work much harder than their abled counterparts to create good art. Previously abled artists who suffer an injury and keep going might be defying a Career-Ending Injury or Dream-Crushing Handicap by relearning and refining their skill despite their disability. Other times it can also be used to show them as a prodigy whose innate talents overcome any supposed hindrance from their disability. It can also be used to show a disabled character's hobby; for example, it is rather common to see Hook Handed characters play the piano.
 Supertrope to Blind Musician (a musician who cannot see) and Deaf Composer (when an artist doesn't have one of the senses seemingly necessary to create or enjoy their art, such as a painter/sculptor who cannot see or a chef with no sense of taste). Compare Genius Cripple, Disability Superpower. See also The Singing Mute, which is for when a speechless character can vocalize nonverbally.
"
Keeping the Handicap|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/KeepingTheHandicap|"A character might voluntarily choose to live with an impediment, whether magical or mundane. From an outsider's perspective, there's no logical reason why they should remain that way. Maybe he's unable to move or speak. Maybe they're Blessed with Suck. Maybe the cure is rare or expensive but is still within easy reach. So why would the character choose to keep the handicap?
 There's a number of possible reasons why. The disabled person might just be accustomed to living with the disability. They might feel that their disability is simply part of who they are or be proud of being disabled. Someone blind or deaf since birth would have a tough time adjusting to the addition of a fifth sense, and one turned into a werebeast many years prior would have long ago become accustomed to a bestial lifestyle. Ultimately, the disabled character believes that it would be more of a hassle to be abled than to be disabled.
 They may also be unwilling to correct the handicap if it makes them more appealing in the eyes of others: for example, for an attractive Love Interest, small imperfections like glasses, speech impediments, or a slight limp would often serve as an additional ""turn-on"".
 The cure could go against their religion or could negate a core principle of their moral compass. Outsiders may claim that Belief Makes You Stupid and the cursed person may have a Crisis of Faith or a Moral Dilemma. They may also believe that they're guilty of something (especially in case of injury-induced handicap) that they believe they deserved it and thus don't wish to have it removed.
 Many cases of Reed Richards Is Useless imply this trope, even if it's not stated outright. When a character lives with a disability in an extremely (technically or magically) advanced world, it's quite difficult to believe that no cure was available for them, so it may be inferred that they decided against taking the cure. Though that's usually the result of creators introducing a disabled character for whatever reason (say, to deliver a disability-related plot or Aesop, or for representation) and hoping the audience doesn't think too hard about what ought to be possible with all the phlebotinum lying around.
 Compare Cursed with Awesome and Disability Superpower (which are common reasons for refusing to get rid of a curse or a disability), Can't Stay Normal, Freaky Is Cool, Be Yourself, I Choose to Stay, Scars are Forever and Status Quo Is God. Also compare Elective Mute and Elective Broken Language, for someone who chooses not to speak or to speak in broken language in spite of having the ability to talk properly. Contrast I Just Want to Be Normal.
"
"""L"" Is for ""Dyslexia"""|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/LIsForDyslexia|"Dyslexia is one of many types of learning difficulties. There are many types of these difficulties and just about everyone has one to some extent or another. With dyslexia, the learning difficulty may range from somebody with horrendous dyslexia who is functionally illiterate, all the way to people who can read just fine, but turn a few letters around when they write. Actually, ""dyslexia"" and the related condition ""dysmetria"" describe a wide range of cognitive problems, including things such as difficulty understanding directions, reading maps, and/or doing logical puzzles.
 In comedy, it's usually portrayed as jumbled, hilariously misspelled words (see the trope picture), sometimes used in order to spell rude words  if spelling something incorrectly a dyslexic wouldn't necessarily form recognizable words at all. In drama and televised series, it's sometimes the focus of a Very Special Episode.
 If you have further interest in the subject or want to know how to portray dyslexia more accurately, check out our Useful Notes page on Dyslexia. Compare Attention Deficit... Ooh, Shiny! and Hollywood Autism, for media's treatment of ADHD and Autism, respectively.
"
Leg Cannon|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/LegCannon|
Little People Are Surreal|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/LittlePeopleAreSurreal|"If you see a little person in a film, or TV show or comic book, chances are whatever you're watching resembles a Disney Acid Sequence.
 Little people rarely just appear in fiction. They tend to show up to make sure the audience understands that a story is surreal. More often than not, they dress in overly colorful clothes, or talk in a particularly strange way, or just stare at the other characters to symbolize that someone's having a nightmare. Sometimes, they're magical.
 Note that this trope applies only when a little person is shown or perceived to be notably different from the ""normal"" reality. (Big Figure in Watchmen, for example, doesn't count.)
 Not to be confused with that other kind of dwarf. Remember: dwarves are fantasy creatures, dwarfs are short humans, and nowadays the polite term for the latter is ""little people.""
 Compare and contrast with Depraved Dwarf. For another physical condition that's often treated as an oddity, see Albinos Are Freaks.
"
Loon with a Heart of Gold|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/LoonWithAHeartOfGold|"In some stories, a person who is insane or at least eccentric may at the same time be one of the kindest and most generous characters. There may be various reasons for this: for example, such characters may preserve childlike innocence lost by ""normal"" people, or their madness (especially if it is of a religious character) may inspire them to do things that are considered ""irrational"" or ""meaningless"", like assisting a seemingly desperate cause or sacrificing oneself for the Greater Good. This trope is Older Than Print: in medieval times, it was a common belief that eccentrics and weirdos were ""touched by God"", and many saints and blessed ones behaved in a quirky manner.
 The character could be freaky or do nonsensical things, but that doesn't mean they are harmful to society, or evil in nature and morality. They are pleasant and do kind acts here and there despite what their otherness or freakiness may suggest. May or may not be a Lovable Nerd.
 Contrast Insane Equals Violent. Not to be confused with Kindhearted Simpleton and Dumb Is Good: while these two tropes imply low intelligence, a Loon with a Heart of Gold may be smart, but quirky or unhinged.
"
Mad Oracle|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/MadOracle|"The good news about this character is that they can see the future. The bad news is that it turns out that seeing the future is not good for your mental health. Perhaps it's the stress of breaking through the boundaries of time, perhaps it's the strain of seeing so much all at once, possibly including alternative futures. It could be that now they can see the future, the concepts of time and causality don't make sense anymore. Maybe they can't handle seeing the truly Bad Future awaiting them. Or it could be that they are only able to see the future because they are mad, writers often don't distinguish. Either way what we have here is easily one of the most useful and irritating types of Seer. Work out what they mean and you have genuine cast iron visions, get confused or ignore it and you will find it coming back to bite you.
 They tend to speak entirely in metaphor, riddles, vagueries, and oblique poetry.
 A partial inverse of With Great Power Comes Great Insanity, related to Go Mad from the Revelation, Poke in the Third Eye, and Prescience Is Predictable. Compare The Schizophrenia Conspiracy, Infallible Babble, His Name Is....
 Compare also The Cassandra, when a character doesn't get mad from predicting the future, but still gets ignored, and sometimes considered as mad by others, because they can predict the future.
 See also Waif Prophet, Junkie Prophet, Fainting Seer, and Doomsayer.
"
Mental Handicap, Moral Deficiency|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/MentalHandicapMoralDeficiency|"The intellectual counterpoint to the Evil Cripple and the inversion of Evil Genius, this character's morals are as repugnant as his mentality is limited. He might be diagnosed with a real-life condition (however inaccurately) in-story, or it might be left deliberately vague, but either way, his intellectual impairment and immorality go hand in hand.
 There can be a number of reasons for this combination. Perhaps the character is so severely limited in his ability to understand what is and is not acceptable that he simply does not know any better. This can go double if he is surrounded by equally or even more malicious abled people who enable or encourage his behavior. Perhaps he is angry at a world that ostracizes or rejects him because of his disability and lashes out because of this. Perhaps his evil and his handicap, at least in theory, have nothing to do with one another; you don't have to be a genius to be dangerous, and evil people come in all forms. Maybe he's an anti-intellectual with a vested interest in peddling bullshit. Or perhaps the writer is simply ""othering"" people with nonstandard intellectual gifts; needless to say, this trope, like Evil Cripple, can be terribly ableist depending on how it's employed. No matter how it's played, potential for Unfortunate Implications runs extremely high.
 The trope can, and often does, overlap with Dumb Muscle, especially if the handicapped character is being manipulated or used by a relative, friend, or associate who does the actual planning. If this is the case, there's a decent chance that the smarter character in the Brains and Brawn duo is physically disabled in some way; writers enjoy pairing this character with the Evil Cripple. It can also easily overlap with Psychopathic Manchild, though the two should not be conflated with one another  Psychopathic Manchild is about a character who is emotionally stunted, while this trope concerns villainous characters with intellectual disabilities. It's not unusual for a character like this to also be portrayed as suffering some form of mental illness, and thus overlap with The Mentally Disturbed, Ax-Crazy, and Insane Equals Violent. However, it's very important to remember that mental disability and mental illness are two different things.
 Compare Insane Equals Violent, Evil Cripple, Eunuchs Are Evil, Depraved Dwarf, and Disability as an Excuse for Jerkassery. Contrast Evil Genius and Dumb Is Good. When this trope is compared to being literally devoid of a soul, check Neurodiversity Is Supernatural. If the handicap is the result of inbreeding, this overlaps with Inbred and Evil. This should go without saying, but No Real Life Examples, Please!.
"
Mental Health Recovery Arc|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/MentalHealthRecoveryArc|"Many people suffer from mental illness. Recovering from it is, more often than not, a long (sometimes lifetime-spanning) and challenging journey, with many illnesses not even having ""cures"".
 In fiction, characters with huge amounts of trauma and mental illness often have arcs where they learn to live with their troubles. Not always, however, does the end result have the character being ""fixed"" of their illness. They'll often learn how to cope with their illness and make progress, but the arcs often end open-ended with them still having symptoms.
 Widespread use of this trope is a relatively recent occurrence thanks to improvements in mental health research and care. Historically, depictions of mental illness and mental illness recovery have been basic and full of misconceptions. The more sensitive and thorough portrayals of the subject greatly differ from the traditional portrayal of The Mentally Disturbed.
 Compare to Coming of Age Story, I Am What I Am, In-Universe Catharsis, Sanity Strengthening, and You Are Not Alone.
Contrast with Epiphany Therapy.
"
Mermaid in a Wheelchair|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/MermaidInAWheelchair|"If they have to disguise their nature for whatever reason, merfolk can hide their tails under a blanket.
 Mermaids can be an outright metaphor for or commentary on disability,noteSirenomelia, also called mermaid syndrome, is a rare disorder in human beings where the legs fail to separate in the womb. perhaps implying that someone who seems disabled/hindered in a conventional environment might flourish under the right conditions. But just as often the work doesn't explore that and merely uses the wheelchair as a prop for the character to be able to move around on land.
 Compare Bathtub Mermaid for a less mobile example of mermaids on land, and Mobile Fishbowl for another way for aquatic species to move around. Contrast Tailfin Walking.
"
Neurodiversity Is Supernatural|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/NeurodiversityIsSupernatural|"For much of human history, up until the rise of psychiatry, mental conditions were commonly understood as related to the supernatural  usually Demonic Possession, sometimes Changelings, Mad Oracles and the like. Science Marches On and the idea is not considered true in the West anymore. This could have been a Trope Breaker, but it wasn't. The idea still interests people and so the trope can still be found in fiction.
 In some uses of this trope, all cases of a particular neurological or psychiatric condition are the result of supernatural circumstances, and you can't have one without the other. Other times, a given condition can be caused by something supernatural, but the same condition can also develop without the involvement of the paranormal. For example, in Percy Jackson and the Olympians, being a demigod isn't the only cause of dyslexia and/or ADHD.
 This trope can potentially overlap with Go Mad from the Revelation, if a character ceases to be neurotypical as the result of tangling with the supernatural or learning Things Man Was Not Meant to Know. However, most of the time their condition is played as a side effect of an ongoing supernatural connection instead.
 Can overlap with The Soulless in regard to sociopathy. See also Mad Oracle and By the Eyes of the Blind. If the character gets something useful out of their supernatural connection, it's also a case of Disability Superpower. If the application of this ""something useful"" changes people's lives for the better in a dramatic fashion, it also makes the characters Inspirationally Disadvantaged. If applied badly, this Trope can create Unfortunate Implications and a Broken Aesop. (If insane people are supernaturally awesome and people trying to help them through therapy or medicine are all allies of whichever evil is roaming around, then doesn't that means that therapy and/or medication are evil (and better off not taken)? Or if the reason for your depression is literally the ghost of your loved one having Unfinished Business and not plain grief, then why bother spending time and money getting counsel, anyway?)
 Contrast and compare The Madness Place, where the hyperfocus common to autistic people conveys incredible scientific talent, as well as Science-Related Memetic Disorder.
"
Obfuscating Disability|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/ObfuscatingDisability|"Sometimes a person with an apparent disability will be more than they seem. Sometimes they will turn out not to be disabled at all. The reasons for faking a disability vary, but it is usually to cause others to underestimate them.
 A particular form occurs in Crime and Punishment Series where one suspect will be obviously be ruled out because they are in a wheelchair and physically incapable of committing the crime. However, at The Summation, the detective announces that the criminal is in fact the paraplegic. This is then followed by the supposed paraplegic getting up and attempting to run. Another variant, commonly used in Courtroom Episodes, involves an Ambulance Chaser lawyer persuading his client to feign injury such as whiplash in order to win a Frivolous Lawsuit settlement. Or the Staged Pedestrian Accident, where the ""victim"" allows himself to get hit by a car, and does a gruesome-looking but harmless tumble.
 It is worth noting that a lot of disabled people may occasionally give the appearance of this trope, when it is anything but. Some conditions might require the use of a wheelchair to avoid exhaustion or discomfort, even though the person is technically capable of standing up and walking for a short while. Other disabilities can be a milder form of a more well-known condition or invisible, but make no mistake: the person in question is still disabled, and they're emphatically not faking it.
 See also Faking Amnesia, Obfuscating Stupidity, Obfuscating Insanity, Pillow Pregnancy, Playing Sick, and Disability as an Excuse for Jerkassery. Contrast Throwing Off the Disability, when a genuinely disabled person makes a miraculous recovery, and Hiding the Handicap, where a person conceals his disability. A villainous character who actually is disabled is an Evil Cripple.
"
Obsessively Organized|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/ObsessivelyOrganized|"Someone who's obsessively organized requires order in their life. They must adhere to the rules, and everything has to be perfectly organized. Stepping out of line isn't an option. Lines must be straight, angles must be just the right degree, and the numbers must absolutely match. Sometimes this translates into Good with Numbers or Hyper-Awareness.
 Can be justified if the character has a career in chemistry or engineering etc., where it really is crucial to have measurements just right, or a job such as bomb technician or infectious disease handler, where doing even one thing even a little bit wrong could mean death for you and others.
 Often a trait of the Defective Detective or the Mad Mathematician. See also Schedule Fanatic, a person who requires everything to be done precisely on time. For a less extreme version, see Neat Freak. When this becomes a superpower see Clock King. A certain type of character will act like this for no other reason than to annoy people.
"
One Armed Warrior|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/OneArmedWarrior|"There are many ways to highlight the skill of a character. One effective way is to make them a Handicapped Badass, giving them a disadvantage that would hinder said skill in anyone else, but not these characters; the character is too badass to let it slow them down. A common way to do this is to make a fighter lose an arm but keep on fighting.
 Even with weapons only meant to be used with one hand, the other arm can be important for things such as balancing, guarding, and, of course, holding things. For someone with one arm, being a master with it anyway, swords being a popular choice, can show their dedication and, often, experience  they had to have lost that arm somehow, after all.
 To make things even more difficult for them, the missing arm is often their dominant arm. One can only imagine how they would have been able to fight with both... though it may have even been not as well since a common variation is for the incident that took the character's arm to serve as a wake-up call to train to the point they're at now.
 Cosmetically, they'll usually cover their missing arm with something, with a Badass Cape being an especially popular choice.
 Compare Hook Hand and Artificial Limbs, where characters are still missing appendages but are still able to use them to a limited capacity. Also compare Blind Weaponmaster, which involves another disability barely affecting one's fighting proficiency. Also compare Ironically Disabled Artist, for when the pen is mightier than the sword.
"
Organ Dodge|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/OrganDodge|"Where a character gets stabbed or shot  usually in the kidney  and it should be fatal. Only it isn't, because they donated that kidney. Or they have dextrocardia. Or that limb was actually prosthetic. Or they only look human when their insides are decidedly not. Or they're a Master of Your Domain who can literally move their organs around. Hell, even if they're not humanoid, the placement of certain organs (e.g. brain and heart) is practically universal among real-life non-microscopic animals that possess them, so an alien having their brain in their foot rather than their head would be completely unexpected, to the misfortune of anyone who tries to kill them by headshot.
 Usually given as justification for Only a Flesh Wound, but sometimes the central conceit around which a climax - or entire plot - is built. Usually used as an ironic counterpoint to the original injury. This is all but guaranteed to happen to people cheated out of organs earlier in the plot, because it's a good way of suggesting ambiguity - after all, if they still had that kidney they were tricked into donating, they'd be dead now.
 If a character is shown to have donated an organ and the genre isn't Medical Drama, they're extremely likely to suffer injury to that area later in the work. Anyone with dextrocardia - where the heart is on the right side of the body instead of the left - is virtually guaranteed to be shot or stabbed where the heart ""should be"" at some point.
 The inverse, where a character who's learned to cope with a handicap or life-altering injury is injured in a way that makes the handicap worse, is fairly common in Darker and Edgier works. This is where, for example, a character who's just undergone extensive cosmetic surgery to repair fire scarring gets caught in another disfiguring fire. Sometimes applies to wheelchairs, canes, and other forms of assistive technology as well, where the short-term consequences can be dire without automatically leading to Nightmare Fuel. Noticeably more common in Police Procedural and Medical Drama genres, if only because this usually shows up as a plot twist in a mystery story.
 Another version is when a character's organs would have been in the right place, but they were deliberately moved before the injury in question.
 Overlaps with Disability Immunity in cases where the trope happens due to the original organ being missing. Compare with Chekhov's Skill if the audience is told about the condition in advance.
"
Physical Therapy Plot|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/PhysicalTherapyPlot|"Sometimes people will be put in an incredibly dangerous situation where their lives will be on the line, whether it's being on the receiving end of an accident, an attempted murder, or even a debilitating disease or medical condition. If they're lucky, they'll walk off without a scratch. On the flip side, it can end horribly with the person dying. But you can also experience something between the two extremes  where you say No One Could Survive That!, yet somehow they do. They make it through, clinging on to life, though still at a great cost. Their bodies become so damaged that they might lose their ability to walk, or even worse, be just a step away from becoming a total vegetable. They can even lose their ability to speak. And sometimes, their mind becomes so scrambled, they may suffer a case of Identity Amnesia. Regardless, losing the ability to do things we take for granted such as walking, eating, and talking (among other things) can definitely take a toll on a person.
 In spite of their current situation though, all hope is not lost. They can regain their mobility and the ability to do what they've done before, with help of a physical therapist. Sometimes, a character won't go through with it at first because  Therapy Is for the Weak. They might salvage their pride and try to live a normal life with their limitations. But after a while, their inabilities may get to them and they decide enough is enough; they want to become the same normal person they were before and agree to the therapy.
 The therapy will, of course, be far from easy as it will not only test their physical abilities but also their willpower. This will often involve learning how to walk again while holding onto rails and exercises to build up muscles and flexibility. They need to build up their strength and stamina, and if they're unable to speak, they may need to take speech therapy. It's not just the physical challenges, either  there are often mental issues to address. Progress will not come quickly, especially with more severe injuries. They will struggle immensely, which can lead to frustration and anger at their predicament, especially if it's not going as well as they're hoping or they're not progressing fast enough. In severe cases, they can even be pushed into a Despair Event Horizon. More often than not, they'll have the support of loved ones such as family, friends, or even a caring therapist to help remind them no matter how hard therapy gets, they should keep working at it and they'll pull through.
 The character will have to dig down deep to find the motivation to get through this. They work twice as hard as before and show some real progress. In the end, after some ups and downs, they'll make it. They will have gained their abilities to move and walk again. They can talk as well as they could before. They'll be their same old selves again, filled with a newfound confidence that if they got through this, they can get through anything.
 Can overlap with Wheelchair Woobie and Throwing Off the Disability (if their treatments go well enough).
 This is a trope that deals with Character Development, so spoilers will be turned off. You Have Been Warned.
"
Physical Disability in Media|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/PhysicalDisabilityInMedia|"This is an index for works that focus on disabilities. One-shots or disabled guest characters are too numerous, so this index is for works that have a substantive focus on physical disability. No examples that include Throwing Off the Disability please, as this is about the specific experience of being (and staying) disabled.
 More specific indexes are Deafness in Media, Autism in Media, and Blindness in Media, so those examples go there, please.
 This index is only for physically disabled characters; see The Mentally Disturbed for portrayals of mental illness in fiction.
"
Plug 'n' Play Prosthetics|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/PlugNPlayProsthetics|"




In real life, learning to use a prosthetic limb takes several months of rehabilitation, especially if it connects to the patient's nervous system. Not so in many works of fiction, attaching a new limb is as quick and easy as plugging in a flash drive.
 A Sub-Trope of Artificial Limbs and Plug 'n' Play Technology. Compare Appendage Assimilation, Easily Detachable Robot Parts, and LEGO Body Parts.
"
Prophet Eyes|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/ProphetEyes|"Characters with cataracted eyes. Sometimes it's just that  cataracted eyes.
 Characters with this specific type of Monochromatic Eyes tend to be Blind Seers or have a blindness-related Disability Superpower. This kind of blindness is ""extra psychic"" or special and is also associated with powers other than prescience. It's not uncommon for some characters in a trance to have their eyes turn milky white while concentrating (rather than roll back into the skull).
 Zombies and some other undead or monsters also have milky white eyes, though in that case, it's that they don't blink for the former, leading to all sorts of crap in your eye. Don't expect this to stop them from actually seeing/smelling their prey with unerring accuracy.
 And sometimes, white eyes simply alert the audience that their owner is supernatural or pure evil.
 This effect can be useful for blind characters in live-action productions because human beings instinctively follow movement and zero in on important things like faces with their eyes, an instinct that is just about impossible to suppress. Milky white eyes make it impossible to tell which way an actor is looking and makes the effect of a blind, fixed stare more convincing.
 This trope has nothing to do with Blank White Eyes except for the color. For other colors, see Monochromatic Eyes. See also Third Eye, Mind-Control Eyes.
"
Prosthetic Limb Reveal|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/ProstheticLimbReveal|"This trope refers to any situation where a character who, at the first glance, looks perfectly fine and you wouldn't expect them to be handicapped in any way, but then they suddenly reveal that they have an Artificial Limb - much to the audience and other characters' surprise.
 One of the common ways in which this occurs is when another character asks the disabled character why are they so serious about something; the latter responds by showing their artificial limb, emphasizing that the thing in question is not a laughing matter, and also providing some backstory for themselves.
"
Reflectionless Useless Eyes|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/ReflectionlessUselessEyes|"Are your eyes reflecting the light? Lower your eyelids until the light is concealed. Voila, you've got yourself Reflectionless Useless Eyes.
 Although often overlapped with ""Uh-Oh"" Eyes, these eyes are not inherently sinister. The primary meaning is in relation to the lowered head or eyelids due to fainting or death, and by extension, the unseeing eyes of the blind. Or they are utilized in a way ours are not because they belong to someone who is notably different.
 Subtropes include Empty Eyes (post-traumatic flat eyes) and Dull Eyes of Unhappiness (which can be cured by taking a level in cheerfulness). A frequent feature of Mind-Control Eyes.
"
Seadog Peg Leg|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/SeadogPegLeg|"An iconic trait of seamen of all kinds, be they pirates, sailors or fishermen, is to have a wood (might also be metal, bone or some other material) stump in place of one of their missing legs, which they probably lost to a shark, whale, crocodile or other aquatic hazard somewhere. As would be expected of any character that lives a dangerous life at the sea, expect said characters to be Badasses, often of the retired variant.
 This was Truth in Television as several pirates, privateers and admirals had those during the modern era. Before the invention of antibiotics in the early 20th century, a broken or otherwise injured limb would often become infected. It was therefore common practice to amputate. Unlike the stereotype, however, a character with a wooden leg would most often become the ship's cook, as the peg leg meant he couldn't climb the rigging anymore.
 A form of Artificial Limbs and a typical feature of a character that is Dressed to Plunder. A Sister Trope to Hook Hand.
"
Serial Prostheses|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/SerialProstheses|"A character, usually a villain, is injured on multiple occasions and each time will have a prosthetic added, be it mechanical or wooden. In order to qualify as this trope, a character must lose at least two body parts on two separate occasions. The prosthetic can range from a simple eye patch and peg leg to the character becoming a full-blown cyborg. Can become a Running Gag if used for comedic effect. Bonus points if the wounds are self-inflicted.
 Compare We Can Rebuild Him, in which a single devastating injury or death necessitates all new body parts in one go. Goes hand-in-hand with Mutilation Conga. May also overlap with Unwilling Roboticisation.
"
Sexy Flaw|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/SexyFlaw|"In romantic relationships, flaws and imperfections often make a person more attractive and serve as an additional ""turn on"". It could be a Speech Impediment, a limp, a dyslexia that results in a lot of spelling mistakes, a curse that causes the person to speak with a Verbal Tic, the fact that the person is a walking dead creature rather than a living human  basically, whatever that is generally considered an imperfection. The reasons for such a reaction are many and varied: it could be the protective feeling inspired by the handicap, the admiration of a person's courage and tenacity in dealing with it, or just the fact that this flaw makes them unique. On the part of the person who has the imperfection, it's a frequent reason for Keeping the Handicap.
 Super-Trope to Sexy Spectacles, subtrope of Attraction to Outliers and Charm Point. Also compare Speech-Impeded Love Interest, Cute Mute, Cute Clumsy Girl, Has a Type, Freakiness Shame, and Uncanny Valley.
"
Shrunken Organ|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/ShrunkenOrgan|"In comedic works it is common to sum up behavioral problems or character flaws as being the direct result of some greatly underdeveloped organ in a character's body. Maybe said character has a heart that is too small and thus cannot properly love or maybe their brain resembles the size of a golf ball and thus lacks normal intelligence. Of course, having an organ this small in Real Life would cause serious complications for most of these characters, so this trope is very often Played for Laughs.
 That being said, there are numerous examples of this trope being played seriously as well, typically in the Medical Drama or Soap Opera realm. While cases of super-small organs in those works are still factually inaccurate, they are at least portrayed in a semi-realistic sense. For example, this trope could be invoked by a character born with some form of congenital heart defect where their heart is too small and will cause their death unless a replacement is found.
 As this trope greatly exaggerates real body parts, it is a natural subtrope of Artistic License  Biology. Contrast My Brain Is Big.
 Not under any circumstances to be mistaken for Teeny Weenie. Also, this has nothing to do with a pipe organ.
"
Single-Episode Handicap|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/SingleEpisodeHandicap|"When the protagonists are struck by a short-lived disability - often blindness - forcing them to rely on other skills for the duration of the episode, but cured by the all-powerful Reset Button, restoring the afflicted parties to normal in time for their next adventure. Sometimes it's intended to teach some sort of moral lesson; sometimes it's treated as just another challenge for the heroes to overcome. Either way, expect much moping around until the heroes come to grips with their situation.
 Those experiencing a Single-Episode Handicap will frequently learn to make up for it in other ways, resulting in a (temporary) Disability Superpower. (Of course, since status quo is restored at the end of the episode, the heroes generally lose their Handicapped Badass permits immediately.)
 Related: Hollywood Healing, Temporary Blindness, Compressed Vice, and some forms of Soap Opera Disease.
"
Speech-Impeded Love Interest|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/SpeechImpededLoveInterest|"Imagine yourself meeting a gorgeous girl that seems to have come from the pages of a romance novel. She seems perfect in every way... That is, until she opens her beautiful mouth. Once she does, you realize that she either has pwofound twouble with her w's, s-st-tutters, lithpth or cannot speak clearly at all. Basically, you have a downplayed version of Disabled Love Interest.
 When the speech impediment is shown to be debilitating (like a severe stutter), it is usually given to a fragile Shrinking Violet who is waiting for her knight in shining armor. Often, though not always, she recovers from the impediment by the end of the story; in this case, that's part of the Adrenaline Makeover with possible Unfortunate Implications because it makes out that a hero wouldn't want a disabled or otherwise ""imperfect"" love. At other times, though, the impediment serves as an endearing quirk which only adds to the character's charm (it may even be lampshaded in-story). In some cases, the Love Interest may even be unwilling to undergo speech therapy for exactly this reason.
 Compare with Cute Mute. An inversion of this trope is a speech-impeded protagonist.
"
Speech Impediment|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/SpeechImpediment|"A speech impediment is a condition affecting some people that hinders their speaking abilities. Unfortunately, those afflicted with a speech impediment tend to be seen as less intelligent than those without. As a result, speech impediments are almost always given to stupid or awkward characters.
 May be faked as Obfuscating Stupidity, or has to be overcome to look intelligent. Rarely is The Hero or a Love Interest affected with this, frequently The Loser. Not to be confused with scared stuttering.
 May manifest as a lisp, or as a stutter. Or it may weveo itself as a weawy pwofound twoubo with the wettehs aw and ehw.
 May overlap with Verbal Tic. Could be caused by Fang Thpeak. Elmuh Fudd Syndwome is a Subtrope (and so is Porky Pig Pronunciation). Can lead to Viewer Name Confusion.
"
Super Wheelchair|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/SuperWheelchair|"In Real Life, being a wheelchair user can range from inconvenient to extremely limiting. (Not the chair partif you need a chair, using one is very freeingbut the lack of arrangements to accommodate it.) However, in fiction, this need not be the case! Thanks to Trope Co. you can be the proud owner of one state-of-the-art super chair! Features include
"
Superpower Disability|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/SuperpowerDisability|"A lot of superpowers come with weaknesses. A good Kryptonite Factor can add danger and drama to a story, and as comic books have become more self aware plenty of authors have taken to exploring the Logical Weakness for their characters.
 And some writers take it further, where the drawbacks of being superhuman are for all intents and purposes a disability all unto themselves.
 Contrast with Disability Superpower, where the disability caused the superpower instead of the superpower causing the disability. Also contrast Disability-Negating Superpower, where a superpower effectively gets rid of a disability.
 See also Blessed with Suck, Heroic RRoD, Power at a Price, Required Secondary Powers, Logical Weakness, Power Incontinence, and Power-Upgrading Deformation. Cast from Hit Points, Cast from Lifespan and Cast from Sanity are subtropes.
"
Swiss-Army Appendage|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/SwissArmyAppendage|"Often a character who is missing a limb will make the best of it by having a whole collection of artificial replacements, that get hot-swapped as the occasion warrants. At least as it applies to heroes, this is predominantly a literary trope, as viewers tend to find obviously artificial limbs unattractive. It's frequently associated with heroes who are older and/or more intelligent than averagethey have to be older because they need to have had time to get injured, and coming up with the idea often seems to connote intelligence (or at least mechanical aptitude).
 Frequently, the limb uses Telescoping Robot technology to generate the tool from Hammerspace.
 When the replacement limbs are collectively more capable than an ordinary one would be, this becomes a kind of Disability Superpower, although the odds of suffering a Fake Arm Disarm increase. These can also include Hook Hand, Arm Cannon, Blade Below the Shoulder, Swiss-Army Weapon, Spider Limbs, etc.
"
Symbolic Mutilation|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/SymbolicMutilation|"A character is mutilated in an explicitly symbolic way. They might not see the truth until they are blinded. A grasping or avaricious character might lose a hand, a vain character may be disfigured, a character who refuses to act may be paralyzed, a character who committed a sexual offense might have their genitals cut off, and one who fails to speak out against injustice might lose their tongue.
 Compare and contrast An Arm and a Leg, which also uses severe injury to advance the plot but the injury itself won't necessarily represent anything specific about the character.
"
Temporary Blindness|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/TemporaryBlindness|"The hero(ine) of an action/adventure series is blinded at the beginning of the episode. The character is told that the damage will heal, provided he does not do any action/adventure heroic things for the next hour. Since the viewer did not tune in to watch the hero convalesce, the plot goes on.
 A supporting character helps the hero get used to his condition. Often, the blinded character's other senses will become much more acute. Unfortunately, the villain of the story sometimes discovers the hero's condition and instantly realizes he now has an overwhelming advantage. However, the hero may still win because the villain usually underestimates how well he has adjusted to his situation  in some cases, the temporary disability may actually give the hero a useful advantage.
 An almost identical plot structure can be used with temporary paralysis, deafness, concussions, etc. Similar but not the same as the Status Effects, as this trope uses blindness for plot reasons.
"
Throwing Off the Disability|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/ThrowingOffTheDisability|"A character who has been disabled for an extended period, often physically or visually, suddenly regains the use of their disabled organ. Expect a dramatic shot of the crutch being thrown away, or the discarded wheelchair clattering its way to oblivion.
 This trope can provoke the implication that any disabled person who doesn't throw off their disability must somehow want to remain disabled. See Epiphany Therapy for characters throwing off mental disorders or psychological trauma.
 See also Artificial Limbs, Beautiful All Along. Compare Abled in the Adaptation, where a characters disability in the original is left out of an adapted work, and Healthy in Heaven, for when characters lose their disabilities in the afterlife.
"
Wheelchair Antics|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/WheelchairAntics|"Wheelchairs are very restricting. You can't move your legs, and can't really use stairs. But some people do notice that wheelchairs have, well, wheels. Those wheels can be used for doing tricks like a skateboard. When someone puts the two together, they realize that a wheelchair can actually be entertaining! It can cause people to be impressed, to the point that they might even try it, even though they might not be disabled. Some other people might get mad for the ruckus you make. All this gets exaggerated in fiction.
 Sister Trope to Swivel-Chair Antics and Shopping Cart Antics. See also Super Wheelchair.
"
Wheelchair Woobie|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/WheelchairWoobie|"An easy way to instantly mark someone as The Woobie is to put them in a wheelchair. Crutches or other similarly visible impediments are common as well, but wheelchairs are the most common. Often, their Woobie status is tied to how they ended up in the thing in the first place.
 This trope is NOT reserved for examples involving wheelchairs; any meaningful disability works. The important thing is that the character's Woobie status be directly tied to them suffering from whatever it is (either with respect to how they got that way or how it is affecting their life).
"
Alternate Identity Amnesia|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/AlternateIdentityAmnesia|"This trope is about characters with a form of Involuntary Shapeshifting or Superpowered Evil Side that causes them to suffer amnesia whenever they transform to their alternate form or self. Typically this trope is most often used in media with werewolves (or any other sort of werecreatures), though characters with a Jekyll And Hyde style Split Personality, Demonic Possession, Mind Control, or an Enemy Within may also suffer from this form of amnesia. When it happens it may be immediately noticeable to the character; they will freak out at suffering blackouts and waking up naked in a field, covered in blood, and surrounded by animal carcassesnote(hopefully it'll be just animal carcasses; human body parts are also a distinct possibility).
 In some cases the amnesiac lycanthrope actually suffers a combination of Laser-Guided Amnesia and Weirdness Censor about the Missing Time; they might spend weeks, months or years unaware of their condition. It helps if they transition into a type of ""sleepwalker"" that walks home and cleans up post transformation. The smarter the alternate form is the likelier this is to happen, since it'll likely want its host to stay unawares as long as possible.
 One dangerous possibility is for characters to become a Zombie Infectee who willfully ignores or rationalizes away any evidence, symptoms, and lost memories. Whether they cop to it or not, expect Amnesiac Dissonance to kick in once they feel the weight of their crimes.
 Typically the memories are merely repressed and come back in a Past Experience Nightmare flashback sequence. If the lycanthopy can be controlled, then learning to do so usually enables the character to remember past events as well as remain lucid and in control during future ones. Occasionally the memories really are irrecoverable, usually if the character is essentially comatose while someone/thing else is in control.
 The explanation for the blackouts is usually that ""the wolf"" has taken over and puts the character to sleep or in the passenger's seat. It's worth noting that the alternate identity isn't necessarily hostile to the character note(indeed, they usually depend on them to exist, save for cases where they plan to pull a Split-Personality Takeover) and in these cases both personalities may try desperately to find means to communicate.
 Contrast And I Must Scream, when the lycanthrope is aware of what's going on but helpless to stop their wolf-self. Compare What Did I Do Last Night?, the alcohol-induced version. Compare The Killer in Me, especially the ""Amnesiac Killer"" type. Compare Trauma-Induced Amnesia, which is also fairly common in disassociative disorders. Compare also Identity Amnesia and Amnesiac Dissonance.
 This is probably the most ""realistic"" presentation of classic multiple personality/dissociative identity disorder  the individual identities may not be aware of the existence or experiences of the other identities, and consequently suffer from time disturbances. It's one of the most frightening things about Real Life multiplicity, especially considering its use in this trope, to the point of stereotype. People in real life who know they're multiple may not come out even to close friends, fearing it's the first thing that'll come to mind. Amnesia is also not true for all real-life multiples across the board, and if someone tells you they do know what their other selves said and did, they are likely telling you the truth. Today's psychotherapy for multiples focuses not on fusion but on communication. Many have worked out their own system, leaving notes or voicemails for one another.
"
Enemy Within|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/EnemyWithin|"A specific form of Split Personality. Maybe the Body Horror became a bit too fused with someone. Maybe the Unstoppable Rage is getting... too unstoppable. Perhaps The Atoner's past is taking on a life of its own. A half-human's Demon / Vampire self is trying to take control, or that Deal with the Devil is hitting a bit too close to home.
 Either way, the enemy is behind the hero's eyes, and its time is coming when it can take over. Until then, it'll do all it can to control him and get him to give in to its Horror Hunger. The thing to stress most is that the Enemy Within is the hero. He or she cannot simply exorcise it out. Often the Enemy Within is the cause of the powers that the hero has that allows them to do what they do. With Great Power Comes Great Insanity, remember?
 Often, since Evil Is Cool and Evil Feels Good, other characters may realize the danger before the hero and need to convince him.
 This trope has received criticism from the mental health community, as it is accused of demonising patients with Dissociative Identity Disorder (or DID), and being seen as one of the reasons for stigmatization against people with DID due to its constant use in media. This was most notably seen in the backlash against Split (2016), whose potrayal of DID was seen by many to be VERY damaging.
 Not to be confused with the expansion pack to the X-Com reboot, nor an unrelated TV series, or another unrelated novel. Contrast Enemy Without. Compare Jekyll & Hyde. Also not to be confused with Kill It Through Its Stomach, which involves an enemy literally inside another. Usually part of their Soul Anatomy.
"
Enemy Without|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/EnemyWithout|"When someone's inner darkness doesn't quite take over someone, but it does ""escape"" their body and rampage. Fighting someone else's Enemy Without is tricky, as often it will either kill the person projecting it if it dies, or it will just resurrect itself until the actual darkness in the hero's heart is dealt with by the hero themselves.
 Often symbolically represents repression, and the hero's refusal to acknowledge the darkness within or some other aspect of themselves. Victory is achieved half the time via ""reintegrating"" with it. The other half of of the time it can be seen as representing some inner demon, and thus, it must be abandoned, purged, or confronted and conquered.
 Sometimes this battle will occur inside someone's own head in a dreamscape, making it both the Enemy Within and the Enemy Without at the same time. It may require saying ""I'm Not Afraid of You!"" to weaken it enough to beat.
 This trope is very similar to The Heartless, Made of Evil, and Literal Split Personality. It is distinguished from The Heartless by having some personal connection to the person/people it was created from, from Made of Evil because the Enemy may be flesh and bone, and from Literal Split Personality by leaving behind a clearly-defined original character.
 See also: Evil Twin, Enemy Within, Ghost in the Machine, Self-Constructed Being, Shadow Archetype, Indulgent Fantasy Segue, Mental Monster, Tulpa, Powering Villain Realization, and Residual Evil Entity. Very dangerous in combination with Superpowered Evil Side.
The ""evil"" is usually part of a character's Soul Anatomy.
"
Evil Brunette Twin|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/EvilBrunetteTwin|"Occasionally, works will reverse the usual set-up, and reveal that a brunette villain has a nicer light-haired twin, though this technically plays the trope straight.
 A Sub-Trope of Evil Twin. See also Hair of Gold, Heart of Gold, Hair-Contrast Duo, and Dark Is Evil.
"
Evil Feels Good|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/EvilFeelsGood|"No one understands Evil Is Cool better than the hero with a Superpowered Evil Side. Once their inner Hyde is unleashed, they become nearly invincible, all but immune to pain, and stronger and more powerful than all the Applied Phlebotinum and Training from Hell in the world could make them. Is it any wonder they get Drunk on the Dark Side?
 But the effect on their body is just a fringe benefit to the effect on their mind. Their conscience just shuts up. They're free to break all the rules, do anything they want. No more scruples, no morals, no inhibitors to hold them back from tearing their arch enemy to shreds. And it feels good.
 Often a motivation for For the Evulz, although For the Evulz doesn't have to involve the character even enjoying the evil they do  they just do it because it's evil.
 For many a hero with a Split Personality, that's the scariest thing about their Unstoppable Rage or Enemy Within  realizing that, deep down, they like it...
 The reason people take Psycho Serum. Cue This Is Your Brain on Evil. Because being bad felt so good, this often leads villains into Reminiscing About Your Victims. When it can be acted out within a video game, this is Video Game Cruelty Potential. Counterpart to Good Feels Good. Usually pit against Being Good Sucks. May have a horrible hangover when Being Evil Sucks. This can also overlap with Card-Carrying Villain and is one of the defining traits of a sociopath.
 Compare Fame Through Infamy when evil feels good because of the ""fame"" it brings.
"
Evil Twin|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/EvilTwin|"Two family members (who happen to look identical) who are moral opposites of one another. Typically done with literal twins, these characters are of the same generation, but may have been raised as ""cousins"", or even completely separated from one another. It's especially popular in a Soap Opera, where they can use an Identical Twin Mistake to wreak havoc with their Good Twin's life.
 Typically the evil twin will be portrayed by the same actor as the regular character. It's worth noting that in the overwhelming majority of cases the twin is evil; only rarely does an evil character suddenly find themselves contending with a good twin, and in those cases the good version is often simpleminded or purely comic. See Good Is Impotent and Impersonating the Evil Twin.
 The evil twin may attempt to convince their good twin that they aren't so different, saying We Can Rule Together and that the good twin's friends are holding them back from greatness. This often ends with a Mirror Match as neither one will be able to convince the other of their ideology. After the fight, their allies will usually need to Spot the Imposter to figure out who won.
 A goatee or other beard is less common for Evil Twins than they are for typical Evil Counterpart examples, because it distorts the use of Always Identical Twins. However, other Identical Twin ID Tag tropes are still used to differentiate between the good/evil twins, such as scars and evil costuming. Very often, one twin will be right-handed and the other left-handed. Guess which one's which.
 This trope is Played for Laughs when both twins are evil, or when a character on the side of the good guys has a good twin show up, implying that the original is the evil one. Sub-Trope of Always Identical Twins (siblings are Doppelgangers), Evil Counterpart (any evil Foil to a character), and Evil Doppelgnger (someone who is both a Doppelgnger and Evil Counterpart). Sister Trope to Evil Knockoff (intentionally created evil duplicate), Cain and Abel (non-twin siblings where one is good and the other is evil), and Criminal Doppelgnger (evil Identical Stranger). Super-Trope to Evil Brunette Twin, where the Always Identical Twins have different hair colours (and the darker one is evil).
 If you were looking for the video game Evil Twin: Cyprien's Chronicles, it can be found here.
 Not to Be Confused with Creepy Twins, which is about twins (usually identical) who are disturbing, usually equally evil.
"
Flip Personality|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/FlipPersonality|"They've caught a Body Snatcher or Symbiote, or are Sharing a Body, and you can tell, because they're obviously switching between minds repeatedly. Often accompanied by changes in manner, posture, voice, or eye color or shape. Those not aware of the circumstances and not sufficiently well acquainted with the originally one-minded character may not notice the change, leading to much opportunity for hilarity to ensue.
 Having arguments with yourself is strictly optional, but again, hilarious.
"
Funny Schizophrenia|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/FunnySchizophrenia|"In Real Life, mental illness of any kind is never a laughing matter. In media, however, it can be played with for humor. When a character swings wildly back and forth between different versions of himself, it's almost always used this way.
 It's also far too often referred to as ""schizophrenia""; while the word literally means ""split mind"", Psychology Marches On and schizophrenia is a complicated condition affecting perception of realitynoteoften featuring hallucinations (usually auditory, aka hearing voices) and delusions (often but not always paranoid). There are other aspects to it, like disordered thinking, but the losing touch with reality (psychosis) is the most important part., while ""dissociative identity disorder"" is the actual condition relating to Split Personality.
 See also Talking to Themself, The Schizophrenia Conspiracy (a Self-Demonstrating Article about the portrayal of the disease), and Insane Equals Violent, another widespread myth about psychosis.
"
Ghost Memory|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/GhostMemory|"A character gets others' memories or abilities through some external means, like magic or... ghosts. Compare with Genetic Memory, which uses genetics, reincarnation, and whatnot. Or Fake Memories, in which the implanted memory is totally made up. Contrast Death Amnesia. Not to be confused with Ghost Amnesia, which is when a ghost can not remember their own memories. Can intersect with Transferable Memory. Also compare Shared Dream, when both characters get the memory/dream at the same time. May explain becoming an Instant Expert.
"
Gollum Made Me Do It|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/GollumMadeMeDoIt|"A character has another personality to keep him company, but has a problem: the other personality isn't exactly a model citizen. However, he is... persuasive. More often than not he finds himself being bullied or coerced into following his darker half's advice, even if it's advice he wouldn't have followed normally. This is in contrast to the conventional Split Personality, where each exists without the knowledge of the other, though in this case this will still sometimes be true to an extent.
 Of course, even if the character doesn't really have a Split Personality, making people think they do is a common opening gambit if they're planning to make an Insanity Defense (or just to get the hero to let his guard down). And if you're looking at a guy pleading with you to save him from his evil other half, how are you gonna tell the difference?
 You'll usually find such a character Talking to Themself, sometimes pleading with himself, trying to convince, warn or downright resist his other half.
 In terms of personality types, expect the evil half to be a dominant, forceful, assertive type, and the good half to be more moral and reluctant to hurt people, which the evil half will see as weak. Getting the weak half to reassert control usually requires it face the evil half by saying something along the lines of ""I'm Not Afraid of You!""
 Related to Enemy Within, and can lead to a Split-Personality Takeover or a Split-Personality Merge. See also Jekyll & Hyde. Can be invoked or exploited by a character with Never My Fault mentality.
"
The Hat Makes the Man|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/TheHatMakesTheMan|"Sometimes, the type of hat a person wears can tell you a lot about their personality. However, these hats go a step beyond and noticeably alter the personality of their wearer.
 The hat (or other headgear, like helmet or crown) may be a form of personality-altering Applied Phlebotinum. Particularly bad cases may function more like Demonic Possession, with the hat completely overwriting the wearer's personality. Or the hat may simply be a Magic Feather, giving the character the boost of self-confidence necessary to alter their behavior. However it works, the character's behavior is markedly different when they wear it.
 A subtrope of Artifact Domination. If the hat alters the wearer's behavior for the worse, then it's also an example of Clothes Make the Maniac. If it's used by someone else to control the wearer it's also a Hypno Trinket. If the hat grants special powers to the wearer, it's a Hat of Power. It has very little relationship to Planet of Hats.
"
Hearing Voices|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/HearingVoices|"Whenever characters start hearing the Voice of the Legion whisper in their ear, or the Black Speech dancing on the wind, there's something bad in store for them... and it comes in four flavors!  Insanity Berry, Evil Sauce, Good Mint, and Chaotic Neutral Licorice.
 Insane  Bob's completely lost his mind, but how can we make that plain to the audience? Simple  Have him mention hearing voices in his head, or depict him conversing with them. Closely related to Split Personality. If Bob is a telepath suffering from Power Incontinence, the voices may actually be the cause of his madness, rather than a symptom.
 Evil  The evil version can come from a lot of sources. Demonic Possession, nearby ghosts, Artifacts of Doom and Tomes of Eldritch Lore. The Demon/Spirit/Artifact(s) possessing Bob may serve as the ""evil"" shoulder angel, and rather than (or in addition to) forcing him to do evil, tells him to. As Bob realizes Evil Feels Good, the demon can then claim that it didn't make Bob do anything he didn't want to.
 Thanks to a deal with Trope Co., for an unlimited time, we've got two new flavors, Sour Good and Mystery flavor. Except in Nebraska, something about Trope Co. and several hundred liters of Psycho Serum.
 Good  The voices come from a higher power, often God or angels. Rather than compel Bob to go on a killing spree, they'll offer him guidance, and likely encourage pacifism. Or cause him to become a Knight Templar...
 Chaotic Neutral  It's often unknown where the voices are coming from, whether the source is holy, unholy, or neutral is never delved into. Or even Maybe Magic, Maybe Mundane. Alternatively, the voices come from a multitude of sources, some good, some evil.
 Interestingly, Bob may not actually be hearing voices  a common variation is for Alice to make him think he is, using a hidden radio transmitter or the like. If that's the case, see Gaslighting. Subtrope of Terrible Ticking, though they're usually implemented differently.
"
The Heartless|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/TheHeartless|"The Heartless are monsters born out of people's negative emotions. They can be a special case of Body Horror, but can also be a part of the victim's Soul Anatomy that has been separated from them, and like a ghost they may not have a physical body at all  in which case, they may be considered a kind of Tulpa. This part of the soul may represent all of a person's animalistic desires without any of the restraint, similar to a Jekyll & Hyde situation, or all of their feelings of suffering, sadness, and anger condensed into a distinct figure. They can be a convenient Monster of the Week since they are an unlimited resource; there always seem to be plenty of victims loaded with problems and angst for The Heartless to feed on. They can also have a self-propagating ""zombie"" effect.
 The trouble for the heroes is that these are difficult to get rid of, especially if The Heartless still displays an awareness of the world (usually, as a ruse of the Enigmatic Minion). If an established character becomes one of The Heartless, they may act as if they have undergone a FaceHeel Turn.
 The All-Loving Hero's power is usually to combat The Heartless or even to heal them. The Anti-Hero or Well-Intentioned Extremist usually insists the victims are too far gone and should be put down before more people get hurt. Occasionally, a victim who is Fighting from the Inside can resist The Heartless' control.
 Depending on the context, this trope may be a subtrope of Abstract Apotheosis. This is because nearly every series that this trope is used in presents these critters as An Aesop about them being in everyone's hearts. Contrast/See also Made of Evil.
 Not to be confused with the Let's Player of the same name, the film Heartless (2009), or the single Heartless by Heart.
"
Helpless Good Side|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/HelplessGoodSide|"Sometimes, when a character has a Split Personality, or two people Sharing a Body, one of them is a total wimp. This can range from merely being incompetent in a combat situation to being unable to take care of their own basic needs, such as feeding themselves and not wetting themselves in public. Regardless, when these come out in a combat situation, the character tends to be royally screwed. If they're on a team, this can transform them from a badass into The Load. When the Big Bad does this, they may become a Zero-Effort Boss or Clipped-Wing Angel.
 Compare Good Is Impotent. Contrast Superpowered Evil Side, which sometimes goes hand in hand with this. Sometimes appears as a result of Easy Amnesia. In a world where Passion Is Evil, the Good side will be passive or emotionless.
"
Heroic Safe Mode|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/HeroicSafeMode|"Heroism is hazardous work for both the body and the mind: it's fairly common for heroes to end up facing at least one emotionally, mentally, or psychically charged event capable of causing a Heroic Blue Screen Of Death that temporarily renders them catatonic. Of course, this wouldn't be a gripping New York Times Best Seller if it didn't happen at the worst possible time to ramp up the tension as the audience is left hoping the Side Kick can protect the hero until he or she snaps out of it.
 Keeping the computing metaphor, some heroes have a heartier Operating System than the norm, which when faced with the Heroic BSoD instead enters Heroic Safe Mode. During this period the hero ""shuts down"" non-essential thought processes and focuses entirely on ""fight or flight"", hoping that when the danger is over they can ""restart"" in safety. Especially strong-willed heroes who go into Safe Mode while loved ones are in danger will usually protect them to near-suicidal extremes. In other cases, they may wind up snapping at their own friends who try to push them out of Safe Mode. Luckily, these loved ones can usually push the restart button with a Cooldown Hug. They will (at best) talk in monosyllables, become either completely emotionless or absolutely enraged, but they will always, always terrify friend and foe alike with an unfiltered Death Glare. When a hero fully reboots from this mode back into their standard operating procedure, Post-Victory Collapse usually kicks in, or the full-on Heroic BSoD may kick in after the direct danger to the hero and/or their companions has passed. It is often seen as the good counterpart of a Villainous Breakdown.
 Where this gets interesting is if the hero has a Split Personality or Adaptive Armor that is not normally in the driver's seat. With the hero ""out to lunch"", the passenger may decide to take survival into his, her or its own hands (neurons?) and control their body until the hero is well again. This varies depending on the nature of the Split Personality. For example, a soul-bound Empathic Weapon might default to Attack! Attack! Attack!, while a more evil Enemy Within might decide it's a good time to unlock the hero's Superpowered Evil Side.
 Once they reboot, they may well regret having not helped save someone, run away, or killed many dozens of mooks... but as friends will remind him, at least he (and they) are still alive.
 This is Truth in Television to a greater degree than a lot of Split Personality Tropes. Many traumatized people deal with their pain by creating a kind of secondary self who is less bothered by the pain because this self is just observing while ""that other self"" is actually experiencing the pain. This function may be one reason for the existence of the Real Life, non-Hollywood Psychology phenomenon of people who have a Split Personality. And people who are multiple in real life and usually operate as a Split-Personality Team may find that in a high-stress situation, some calmer or more competent individual may shove their way to the front and remain there for the duration.
 In a less extreme form, it is considered a healthy coping mechanism. People using this strategy to deal with dangerous or otherwise overwhelming situations will often say to themselves something like, ""I have to focus on survival right now. I'll deal with these feelings later."" This is different from repression because the person is not trying to forget or suppress emotions, only to delay dealing with them until it's safe to do so. People capable of shifting focus away from their own emotions, without suppressing them, are often very resilient; so this is a trait often seen in characters whose professions often take them into emotionally charged situations  soldiers, emergency workers, spies, police, superheroes, and similar.
 See also Superpowered Alter Ego, Defense Mechanism Superpower, and It Never Gets Any Easier.
"
Hyde Plays Jekyll|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/HydePlaysJekyll|"Sometimes, Mr. Hyde's not interested in making Dr. Jekyll do anything. He just needs a piece of information that he knows that Dr. Jekyll and all the other good guys have. Unfortunately, all of those good guys know that whatever Hyde's going to do with that information, it's not going to be good for them. What's a poor Superpowered Evil Side to do? Well, if he just claims to be his Helpless Good Side, he might be able to trick them, right? After all, it's not like they look any different from each other.
 This is when one part of a Split Personality intentionally tries to pretend to be the other half. Note that the two characters must be within one body in order for this trope to apply. Otherwise, it's Spot the Impostor or Twin Switch.
 In a way, this is perhaps the ultimate form of Spot the Impostor, since there aren't even two bodies to let the others know that there definitely is, in fact, an imposter. Just two minds, and if one mind has the other's mannerisms down pat, it can be very difficult for others to figure it out. The best way to beat it tends to be by Fighting from the Inside or noticing Something Only They Would Say or an Out-of-Character Alert.
 Notwithstanding the description above, any personality might do this. The Superpowered Evil Side might try this in order to get the good guys to let their guard down and let him get at the Applied Phlebotinum. A Helpless Good Side might do it in order to bluff some bad guys he'd otherwise have to fight. There can be many reasons.
 See also Impersonating the Evil Twin and Mask of Sanity.
"
Identity Amnesia|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/IdentityAmnesia|"Amnesia comes easy in fiction. It is also conveniently specific. A taste of Applied Phlebotinum, a particularly shocking traumatic event, or even a simple Tap on the Head will be sufficient to make your character forget all about who or what they are.
 In most cases, the character has simply lost their memories, no longer remembering their name, loved ones or where they came from. This is often the cause for a Quest for Identity.
 Sometimes, however, it is their personality that has changed. Not only do they not remember who they were, they are convinced that they are someone else entirely. In essence, Bob doesn't just forget that he's Bob, but he thinks he's Alice instead...
 The affected character may have additional amnesia on top of their personality change, but it's not a guarantee. It's possible they may still know everything they did prior to the switch, except that they've never before acted the way they're acting now. Attempts to get them to remember previous life-defining events that may snap them out of it are likely to be met with a stern dismissal: ""Why do you keep talking about this ""Bob"" guy?! I haven't time for this! I'm a world-famous opera singer and must be on stage in one hour!""
 Just like other forms of TV amnesia, this variety is often rectified by just smacking the character in the head a second time; they are usually very resistant to seeking out help on their own. As far as they're concerned, nothing is wrong.
 Once restored, they'll probably have no recollection of their amnesia-induced alter ego, and will probably be puzzled as to why time has moved forward by several hours/days.
 Once their Jekyll & Hyde nature has been demonstrated, it's a foregone conclusion that should the character in question get tapped on the head at a later date, the alternate persona will be right back in the saddle again.
 A vast exaggeration of a Truth in Television mental disorder, known as a ""Fugue State"". This is when someone believes themselves to be someone completely different. They may move to a different town and assume a different identity, without being aware the new identity is false. It is a very, very rare result of a psychotic break. Dissociative amnesia can also parallel this trope, but also under very rare and extreme circumstances.
 Clinical identity amnesia is the inability to identify with things you have done or said. You still remember who you are, but have no memory of having done certain things. You're just as likely (or more) to disown good deeds as bad ones.
 See also Brainwashed, Easy Amnesia, Fake Memories, We Want Our Jerk Back!, Wistful Amnesia, Amnesiac Hero, and Amnesiac Lover. Not to be confused with I Am Who?
"
Jekyll & Hyde|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/JekyllAndHyde|"When a character and his Evil Twin, Evil Counterpart, or Shadow Archetype are really the same guy after all. Or, sometimes, a completely different character is sharing body space with another. The point is, the villain lives inside the hero's body, and therefore hides in plain sight. The hero is trying to catch himself.
 If the two personalities are aware of each other, this becomes a case of Gollum Made Me Do It. For a more mundane version, see Mood-Swinger. See In Vino Veritas if the change is alcohol-induced (you could call it ""Dr Jekyll and Mr Jack Daniels""). As an evil Hyde personality's crimes are outside the good Jekylls control and the Jekyll is usually unable to stop the Hyde emerging, this is often a case of being Driven to Villainy.
 Sometimes, though, the Hyde is not really evil; it may just be more instinctual or capable of using violence when necessary... See Wikipedia Behavior for the wiki version of this, also known as ""Dr. Pedia and Mr. Trope"". Also, a ""Jekyll"" persona isn't necessarily entirely ""good"" either  it may just be subtler or more self-controlled. After all, in the original story, Jekyll created Hyde as an outlet for his darker impulses, thus acknowledging that he had such impulses. Occasionally, the situation can be resolved (not necessarily favorably) with a Split-Personality Takeover, or with a Split-Personality Merge that reconciles both sides into a healthy whole. See also Superpowered Evil Side and Helpless Good Side.
 The trope name comes, of course, from The Strange Case of Dr. Jekyll and Mr. Hyde, by Robert Louis Stevenson. The dual nature of Jekyll was actually originally a Twist Ending in the case of that story, but the book became famous and now it no longer surprises anyone. Most adaptations of the work focus on the dichotomy from the start. Other occurrences of the trope may still manage to surprise if theyre well done.
 The real-life example of Deacon Brodie (cabinet-making pillar of the church by day, burglar by night) is said to have inspired Stevenson, as did the story of Horace Wells, a pioneer of medical anesthetics. While researching chloroform by testing various dosages on himself, Wells unknowingly built up a dangerous level of the drug in his system, and ultimately attacked two prostitutes with sulfuric acid in a state of intoxicated paranoia. He then committed suicide after sobering up and learning what he had done.
 Since the fact that the hero and the villain are the same person could often be used as a twist ending, beware of spoilers on this page.
 See also Hyde Plays Jekyll, when the Hyde personality is in control and pretends to be Jekyll in order to fool others.
"
The Killer in Me|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/TheKillerInMe|"A character (usually the main character, but sometimes sharing equal billing) is chasing or being chased by a killer or monster. A lot of people end up dead, but not this character, and in the end we find out why: the ""hero"" was the villain all along.
 The Amnesiac Killer is the more common variation, primarily because it's easier to write, as the audience is taken through the same reveal as the character himself. The Secretive Killer is particularly hard to pull off with the main protagonist (a minor protagonist is more commonly used for this reason) since the audience is always told the story from their perspective. If the events are shown directly, maintaining the twist right until the end therefore runs the risk of either Out Of Character Moments or losing focus on the character to conceal their real identity. A reliable method is to have the events (re)told through an Unreliable Narrator.
 In many cases, the Amnesiac Killer is essentially a Memory Gambit told In Medias Res. A Split Personality is common; see Alternate Identity Amnesia. This trope could be the result of a HeelFace Brainwashing. In Speculative Fiction, this may be due to a Superpowered Evil Side or Enemy Within.
 When handled with care, it can be a powerful Twist Ending. When tacked on just for the sake of surprising the audience, however, it is likely that key events in the story will become illogical, or in the worst case, physically impossible.
 Compare Tomato in the Mirror, in which the character finds out some other truth about who or what they are.
 Note: This is a Spoilered Rotten trope, that means that EVERY SINGLE EXAMPLE on this list is a spoiler by default and will be unmarked. This is your last warning, only proceed if you really believe you can handle this list.
"
Literal Split Personality|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/LiteralSplitPersonality|"A character gets split into two or more copies of themself, each of which reflects some facet of their personality. This can be similar to Evil Twin, but the split need not be along the good/evil axis. Sometimes seen as part of a Journey to the Center of the Mind. When this is not the case, it's usually an effect of the Applied Phlebotinum of the week.
 Often the parts have to work together, as none of them is individually capable of what the original character was. Sometimes, as they spend more time together, they start to become more like each other. Ultimately, they may come back together through a Fusion Dance that is also a Split-Personality Merge.
 Compare Enemy Without, but the components are not necessarily enemies, and unlike in Enemy Without none has any particular claim on being the ""original"" version. Also compare Self-Duplication, which is similar in appearance, if nothing else. Contrast Fusion Dance, where two or more beings become one being.
 Not to be confused with Half the Man He Used to Be.
"
Living Memory|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/LivingMemory|"The flesh is weak compared to the mind, heart and soul, especially when in the throes of passionate emotion. Some places are especially malleable to psychic phenomena. Combine the two and you have the Living Memory, an echo of a person who either is still alive or has definitively gone on to a final reward (or punishment).
 The Living Memory is a very strange ""being"" and similar to ghosts in a lot of ways. Physically they're usually intangible (though Your Mind Makes It Real can make them dangerous regardless), but some are in physical (though probably non-human) bodies. They may be fully sapient and can be reasoned with, a chunk of memories with a bit of personality, or just vinyl records on an endless loop. What they all have in common is that they are not the real deal, the original, just an eerie simulacrum... and some even realize it.
 When characters encounter a living memory, it's usually a highly emotional encounter. The Living Memory may distress the character emotionally, try to attack them... or offer encouragement and absolution for past sins. Like we said, Living Memories are strange.
 Compare Ghost Memory, where someone's memories are implanted or transferred into someone else's mind. See also the Pensieve Flashback, where characters enter a memory as observers.
"
Many Spirits Inside of One|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/ManySpiritsInsideOfOne|"Some people are victims of Demonic Possession or Grand Theft Me. Others have to struggle with the Enemy Within or even an outright Superpowered Evil Side. All those things are terrible in their own way but don't worry, it can always go From Bad to Worse. It's one thing when your body is taken by the lord of all evil himself, but when he invites his twelve best drinking buddies to join the ride, that's something else entirely.
 This trope is what you get if you exaggerate Demonic Possession or Enemy Within. Instead of having one evil/antagonistic being taking over somebody, it's multiple ones. Somebody doesn't have just Jekyll & Hyde inside his headit's Jekyll, Hyde, Steve, and Edmund. And Zoidberg.
 The Trope Namer is a song by HammerFall, based on the famous biblical tale of Legion, man possessed by multiple demons, which is obviously the Trope Codifier. Contrast I Am Legion, another trope named after this tale (and a story in The Bible), which occurs when members of a group start referring to themselves as a group, rather than individual people, implying that they lost their individuality or at least see themselves as a community or partners.
 Compare Mind Hive and Split-Personality Team, similar tropes involving multiple minds/personalities simultaneously inhabiting one body, but are more or less in accord with each other. Many Real Life multiples describe their experience this way rather than in mental-illness terms.
"
Mind Hive|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/MindHive|"As a Hive Mind is one mind, many bodies, a Mind Hive is the opposite - many minds, one body.
 The minds/consciousnesses/souls/whatnot of different people are housed within one body, most likely through magical or technological means. The minds can communicate with each other, and normally actions are through consensus.
 Distinct from Split Personality because even if what's housed inside is totally separate entities that got merged, they still retain their individuality. Sometimes may speak in I Am Legion pattern. Compare Sharing a Body, Two Beings, One Body, and Many Spirits Inside of One. Contrast Merger of Souls. See also Animal Eye Spies.
"
Multi-Gendered Split Personalities|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/MultiGenderedSplitPersonalities|"Split Personalities are weird things. They can have completely opposing personality traits to the main personality, different skills sometimes... But perhaps one of the oddest from a logical standpoint is when a split personality is actually a different gender from the main personality and from the body they control.
 How exactly they rationalize this gender incongruity can vary and tends to depend on Alternate Identity Amnesia. Some may see their own body as fitting their perceived sex. Some may simply ignore it. Some may consider themselves transgender. Some may believe their body was physically changed when they were unconscious (which the audience may be led to believe as well). Every mental coping mechanism will be a brain-twister, however.
 Mixing in actual forms of Gender Bender can add a new layer of complexity: A personality fronting may involve an extreme Split-Personality Makeover where the body changes sex to match them. Conversely, when The Mind Is a Plaything of the Body, the dysphoria brought on by a transformation can cause dissociated identities of different gender. And this is without getting into opposite sex individuals that ended up Sharing a Body.
 Compare Super Gender-Bender for when your other gender split personality has superpowers.
 Truth in Television for real-world multiples (including but not limited to Dissociative Identity Disorder), for whom this is a very normal, routine occurrence along with selves of different races, ages and even species coexisting.
"
Not Himself|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/NotHimself|"A close relative of Evil Twin and ""Freaky Friday"" Flip, Not Himself is any plot where a character acts contrary to the way they normally behave. Can be used to provide a mystery to be solved, or to incite bewilderment in the other characters. The deviation is often a marked increase in evil, insanity, and/or horniness: the emergence of the inner shadowor a switcheroo.
 Sometimes, it's a detective or police character behaving as if they were corrupt, or a criminal. This will usually turn out to be the Fake Defector. On other occasions, it might be the result of Demonic Possession.
 If the change is deliberate to save their friends, it's an invoked Out-of-Character Alert.
 If the change is caused by poor writing or is never given an in-canon reason, this could be Character Derailment.
 Compare Out-of-Character Moment and Weirder Than Usual. Contrast with Something Only They Would Say. See also Virus-Victim Symptoms. Not to be confused with Not as You Know Them, where an established character's significance in a production is derailed or minimized order to benefit another character (usually to replace them).
"
Sexier Alter Ego|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/SexierAlterEgo|"This trope is for characters of any gender that have an alternate form or identity that is much sexier than their normal mode. It's not necessarily because their ""civilian"" mode is ugly, but it is generally more mundane or otherwise less appealing than their ""heroic"" mode. Depending on the genre, the changes can be accomplished through either regular means such as acting and swapping wardrobes or though various magical or phlebotinum-driven methods. This usually involves a change in a character's physical appearance, but sometimes it's purely a change in personality traits and behavior, suggesting that the character in question is deliberately making themselves appear unattractive to hide their Secret Identity.
 Given that sexual attractiveness is subjective, the best examples are those when the sexier nature of the alternate form is shown from the perspective of another character reacting to them with subtle flirting and innuendo that otherwise wouldn't be present. That said, it's generally pretty clear when the creators of the story are trying to change someone from Hollywood Homely (or even downright ugly) into Ms. Fanservice or a Head-Turning Beauty.
 This often overlaps with Split Personality, Shapeshifting, Older Alter Ego, and Superpowered Alter Ego.
 Compare A Darker Me. Compare also to Shapeshifting Seducer where a shapeshifter capable of assuming many forms takes on several in an attempt to appeal to a specific person. She Cleans Up Nicely should be used for when a character changes from their usually dull or unattractive wardrobe, hairstyle and such to be more attractive (particularly at a formal event) however this new appearance is not associated with an alter ego or alternate physical form. Also see Evil Is Sexy.
 See also Bishounen Line for when a monstrous character gets sexier once they hit a certain power level, and With Great Power Comes Great Hotness when they get more attractive with power in general.
"
Shadow Archetype|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/ShadowArchetype|"Shadow Archetype has to do with two elements of writing: characters and settings. In this article we discuss character archetypes. For the settings viewpoint, see Shadowland.
 Character-wise, it's the part of the personality that embodies everything a character, called the 'Self', doesn't like about themselves, the things they (often subconsciously) deny about themselves and project on to others. In fact, the more the Shadow has been repressed, the more powerful it becomes. To show these things to the audience we need an embodiment of some sort.
 Around here, we call some of those embodiments things like:
 Those tropes have examples listed of characters playing those more-precise Shadow roles that often overlap with this but do not have to.
 A common trope involves the Self accepting their Shadow, metaphorically coming to terms with their flaw (see I Am What I Am). That is, The Hero refuses to kill the Shadow, given the opportunity, or outright refuses to fight it. In Enemy Within, Enemy Without, and Evil Twin situations, the Self and Shadow sometimes even merge towards the end for an endgame powerup, further emphasizing the symbolism.
 Note that in Jungian psychology, the Shadow Archetype includes positive as well as negative things, anything suppressed or denied in the personality. Compare and contrast Foil and Mirror Character which highlight traits a character has or lacks.
"
Split at Birth|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/SplitAtBirth|"A Speculative Fiction variant of Separated at Birth: Our hero meets a character who appears at first to be his long-lost twin - until it is revealed that they are, in fact, the same person split in infancy by Applied Phlebotinum.
 Often the ""twins"" are characterized as inverses (either Polar Opposite Twins or Evil Twin) since the original's personality traits were divided unevenly between them (e.g. one ""twin"" got all the confidence, leaving the other timid and introverted). Note, however, that the ""twin"" is not necessarily evil or even antagonistic; he may simply be an alternate version of the character.
 See Separated at Birth if the character is a real twin.
"
Split Personality|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/SplitPersonality|"A character's mind is split between two or more personalities. Usually, these personalities will have distinct traits, motivations, and memories. They may or may not be able to interact with one another (or even be aware of each other's existence). Control over the character's mind and body will often switch between these personalities against their will, causing problems for both themself and everyone around them.
 Fictional split personalities can be similar to a real-life condition, Dissociative Identity Disorder (or DID). DID is a mental disorder in which more than one distinct personality can be observed at different times within a single individual's brain, often associated with extreme long-term childhood trauma. The individual has no control over when their personalities ""switch"", and may not remember what they did or what happened to them while another personality was active (dissociative amnesia). DID has often been mischaracterized in the media, and its status remains controversial to this day.
 Split personalities have been represented in many different ways over the years. Though characters with such conditions are surprisingly common in fiction, most of them don't match the textbook definitions of DID. The most common case shown is where two (or more) personalities switch with one another; some depictions show people experiencing life as one person (i.e. having the same mind, memory and desires) but with modes of behavior that switch between distinct states.
 The most common usage of split personalities is a Jekyll & Hyde scenario, where a person has a ""good"" personality, and a ""bad"" one. Switching between these personalities might be signified by visual changes. The ""good"" personality may have trouble controlling the ""bad"" one, which may come out at inopportune times, bully the ""good"" personality into cooperating, or try to take over entirely. If theyre lucky, the character may be able to merge their personalities back together, allowing them to function as a single (and usually greater) mind.
 Compare and contrast with Double Consciousness, Mind Hive, Sharing a Body, Two Beings, One Body, and Talking to Themself. May overlap with Identity Amnesia. Also compare Many Spirits Inside of One, where a person is possessed by multiple independent spirits; and Napoleon Delusion, where a person falsely believes their body is inhabited by the spirit of a famous figure. When this happens to a superhero, it's often a Superpowered Evil Side. Shapeshifting is sometimes involved. If the personalities go back and forth, Flip Personality ensues.
 If the two personalities are aware of each other, expect a Gollum Made Me Do It situation to develop. Resolving it may require the weaker of the two to say ""I'm Not Afraid of You!"" If the Split Personality gets its own body it becomes either a Literal Split Personality or Enemy Without (if said personality is antagonistic or evil). See also Heroic Safe Mode for one explanation as to how a side like this can be created.
"
Split-Personality Makeover|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/SplitPersonalityMakeover|"When dealing with a character that has a Split Personality, there will frequently be a striking visual difference depending on who is ""in control."" It's not a literal transformation, like the original Jekyll and Hyde; it's still recognizably the same person, but the differences will be visible. This may include anything from subtle stylistic changes (the character's design becomes more hard and angular when an evil or aggressive personality is in control, but softer and more rounded when a kind and good personality is in control) to more physical things like changes in hairstyle and black bags under the eyes. A significant vocal shift is common as well.
 Some of these changes are perfectly possible to do without physically altering the person's body, like the personalities having hair that's styled differently (or one of them not styling it at all and another styling it neatly) but the same length, or changes in body language and posture, or talking differently without completely changing voice actors, but others are firmly in the realm of Artistic License.
 These changes may or may not be noticed in-universe; if they are, expect them to treat the change as something intangible. They'll comment ""he's like someone completely different now!"" or ""that's not the person I know!"" rather than ""hey, when did you get your hair cut?"" or ""did your voice just drop two octaves?"".
"
Split-Personality Merge|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/SplitPersonalityMerge|"So Bob is also Charlie, maybe even with a little Albert hiding in there somewhere. There are many possible reasons for the existence of these split personalities, but this co-habitation is rarely peaceful or long lasting, inevitably resulting in a Battle in the Center of the Mind to try and find out which personality will take over. Sometimes though, the winner might not reduce the loser to a tiny, powerless voice or destroy it completely, and instead offers to become one again. With a little Epiphany Therapy, Applied Phlebotinum or even actual psychotherapy, they merge into a single, whole person that is greater than the sum of its minds.
 The resulting merged personality is usually a composite of the parts that is well and truly psychologically stable. This is especially true if they were an id, ego, and super ego. If they were moral or temperamental opposites, the resulting merged personality will keep traits of both. In more action-driven works, this merger includes combat ability and powers, so if the character had a moron and a badass coexisting, the united whole will be a badass all the time... while occasionally tripping on banana peels. Similarly, if the reason for the personality split was to seal awesome cosmic powers away (resulting in a Superpowered Evil Side; see both Enemy Within and Enemy Without) the united self will have full control over these powers without risk of Super-Power Meltdown or corruption. If the integration isn't a completely smooth ride, however, expect aftereffects similar to Amnesiac Dissonance.
 This has notably been the accepted method of treatment of those with Dissociative Identity Disorder (DID) by psychiatrists.
"
Split-Personality Switch Trigger|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/SplitPersonalitySwitchTrigger|"A Split Personality doesn't always switch at random. Many of them have a specific trigger associated with one or more personalities that cause them to come to the forefront. The large majority of examples use anger as the trigger, but there are some that are more specific. Examples that are Played for Drama might have the trigger be associated with some episode of the characters' Dark and Troubled Past.
Played for Laughs examples tend to make the trigger an Amusing Injury, particularly a bop to the head, which can even lead to the development of a split personality if the person doesn't already have one (but only in fiction). A Switch Trigger can also be added to the personality after the fact by a psychologist or the like, to help the afflicted person cope with their disorder better.
 There are three ways this trope can be used, depending on what kind of Split Personality the person has:
 Over the course of the story, the personality in question may become able to overpower the Trigger and stay in the driver's seat.
 This is Truth in Television; real cases of DID are the result of severe trauma experienced in childhood, and as such, the factors associated with such trauma will cause the alternate personality to take over and protect the person from being reminded of their past.
 Compare Trigger Phrase, a set of words that causes various effects on its target, and might be this trope if they have a Split Personality. Can overlap with Split-Personality Makeover or The Hat Makes the Man if the trigger involves changing the character's appearance.
"
Split-Personality Takeover|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/SplitPersonalityTakeover|"After months or years of suffering a Split Personality, Enemy Within, or Superpowered Evil Side, the character is cured! ...by having the weaker, ""sane"" personality lose all control over the body to their inner evil. Like the slow erosion of a mountain, Jekyll has succumbed to Hyde's implacable id-like force, leaving nothing but the shell of who they were.
 This isn't just an identity crisis or something that can be wished away with good intentions, at least not easily. This is the permanent and literal death of a person  or at least a personality.
 This is especially common if one personality is more dominant than the other, or the ""good"" personality is subject to Mind Rape or a Heroic BSoD. Occasionally, a truly strong-willed ""good"" personality can do the takeover  although it's likelier that they'll choose to ""merge"" or reintegrate with their evil side into a ""whole"" personality because Good Is Impotent.
 If the takeover is incomplete, expect to see signs that the original is Fighting from the Inside. Antonym to Split-Personality Merge. Compare and contrast with Copied the Morals, Too, where some sort of evil clone or knockoff of a heroic character somehow inherits the heroic character's morality, much to the detriment of the villain's plan. When this is induced by outside brainwashing, it may be Brainwashing for the Greater Good.
"
Split-Personality Team|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/SplitPersonalityTeam|"Split Personalities aren't always hostile to the original or radically different in Character Alignment. Sometimes the personalities are different in complementary rather than strictly antagonistic ways. Sometimes they even have common goals.
 In a Split Personality Team, a character's multiple personalities have a ""division of labor"" in which each personality takes charge during a particular emotion, challenge, or aspect of life. The personalities that take over during these special circumstances generally have skills or psychological traits that suit them for the job. A common variation is a more resilient or even badass personality that surfaces during moments of extreme stress if the core personality is psychologically fragile.
 The Split-Personality Team is less horror-oriented than other Split Personality Tropes, because the alternates are generally on the core personality's side, or at least looking out for their shared welfare. It's more commonly used in psychologically oriented stories exploring the complexity of a character's fractured mind. Some Real Life accounts of Dissociative Identity Disorder report a similar phenomenon, which may have inspired the trope. DID patients in therapy may, rather than setting a goal of merging into one personality, choose to work toward a psychologically healthy Split Personality Team.
 May involve Talking to Themself. Compare Mind Hive and some instances of Multiple Head Case. Multiform Balance is the shapeshifter version.
"
Super-Powered Alter Ego|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/SuperpoweredAlterEgo|"The case where a being is able to engage in superheroics or grand villainy not by gaining any powers or by being a Badass Normal, but by being a vessel in some fashion for another personality that does have superpowers, but only when that personality takes control.
 This personality can also look and be physically very different. This takes several superhero/villain issues and solves them in a single stroke. They don't need a disguise because you wouldn't be able to tell by looking at them. Normally, however, writers will not remove the issue of being discovered; they'll use the single moment of transformation as a time where the secret can be discovered or requires the hero diving off into that phone booth. They just don't have to constantly worry about the issue. They can keep the superhero relatable by having the non-powered character be The Everyman or Ordinary High-School Student. They also won't have the same ""using your powers for selfish gain"" issue because a complete personality change can't be used so easily.
 The transformation can often be handled by a Transformation Sequence. Issues about how the personality is split off can vary. Sometimes it's like it's just another person hiding inside their body until the right moment, other times it's a total personality shift but they'll retain the memories of being that Superpowered Alter Ego and it will still be them. Maybe some Fan Wank, or even deliberate ambiguity, will occur over how much the alter ego is a separate personality at all or whether it's more of a Super Mode or Henshin Hero with a confidence boost.
 When the superpowered side is evil, then it is, rather unsurprisingly, the subtrope Superpowered Evil Side. This trope itself is the subtrope of Sharing a Body.
"
Superpowered Evil Side|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/SuperpoweredEvilSide|"The fight's not going so well for our hero. He's wounded and at the end of his strength, and his barely scratched opponent looks down at him and sneers. And then the hero somehow suddenly taps into a massive hidden power source within him and unleashes a can of whoopass on his opponent.
 Unfortunately, it's not exactly the hero anymore. He's got glowing eyes, some new Facial Markings, a different way of talking, some new threads, and a lot less compunction about ripping someone in half. It's his Super-Powered Evil Side. Think of it as the Enemy Within when it's not the enemy, or as Jekyll and super-Hyde.
 Interestingly, notwithstanding the name, this character isn't necessarily evil  he just seems like it because a superpowerful version of a normal person who has no compunctions about randomly destroying things registers objectively as ""evil"" on most people's scale. To be technically accurate, this is more of a Super-Powered Alter Id  this personality is the physical manifestation of the character's basic drives without having to deal with the inconvenience of higher thought processes and morality  but sometimes this character will have traits of actually being evil or even worse.
 Keep in mind, of course, that as the Id not only represents ones most base and primal desires, it also represents the instincts to survive, so once its let out of the subconscious it's not likely to want to go back in. Thus, the hero faces the very real threat of not returning to normal, each bout of Alternate Identity Amnesia causing him to get more worried about the next. Generally speaking, though, he's usually safe unless he starts thinking Evil Feels Good.
 The narrative purpose of having a super-powered evil side is that it provides a way of saving a hero who is otherwise beaten but without making the hero look disproportionately powerful. It answers the question ""why doesn't he just do that all the time?"" with ""because then the evil would take over."" Additionally, if it leads to a FaceHeel Turn, it can serve the same purpose as Good Is Dumb in reverse  it justifies taking one member of the Five-Man Band or whatever and making him a match for his entire team while he has given in to evil. Alternatively, the evil side may escape his mind/body altogether, becoming a very dangerous Evil Counterpart.
 This is the converse of With Great Power Comes Great Insanity, seeing as in this case, with great insanity comes great power.
 One possible variation on this trope makes the Evil Side the original personality. This creates the odd situation of an ""Evil"" super-powerful monster whose ""Good"" not-as-powerful personality is dominant for whatever reason.
 This is sometimes the reason to Beware the Nice Ones. Compare with Crouching Moron, Hidden Badass, Demonic Possession, Jekyll & Hyde and One-Winged Angel. Frequently overlaps with Sealed Evil in a Can and Sealed Badass in a Can. Contrast Heroic Resolve, My Name Is Inigo Montoya, and Helpless Good Side, although that last one sometimes goes hand in hand with this. May be caused by The Corruption. One possible way of Taking A Level In Badass, and in many ways, this is what The Berserker does.
 Sub-Trope of Enemy Within and Super-Powered Alter Ego. If the Super-Powered Evil Side is triggered by the character's anger or rage, then it is a type of Hulking Out.
"
Talking to Themself|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/TalkingToThemself|"It seems that in fiction split personalities can talk to each other, manifesting as Hearing Voices. Sometimes the various personalities will talk to each other inside the character's head, sometimes one of them (by implication the ""real"" or ""dominant"" one) will talk out loud, and sometimes they'll all talk out loud, being distinguished by cinematography, facial expression or vocal differences. While different people in a multiple personality group can and do talk to each other, this is of course exaggerated for dramatic purposes in media portrayals of multiple personalities  see Split Personality for a more in-depth explanation.
 Even entirely sane (or mostly sane) people can be prone to this trope if the other voices represent simple conflicting desires like ""brain versus heart"", ""id versus superego"", or Good Angel, Bad Angel.
 Compare Holding Both Sides of the Conversation, where one person is pretending to be two different people (at the same time, in conversation) in order to maintain some charade. This is a specific form of Shifting Voice of Madness, where the ""voices"" are in conversation with each other.
 Very important: do not confuse Thinking Out Loud with this. Thinking Out Loud is not a symptom of mental illness in most casesnote(and is actually a recommended coping mechanism for ADD/ADHD, some learning disabilities, recovering from a stimulant drug addiction, or similar attention or concentration deficit issues).
 For instances of a person who is literally speaking to another version of themself due to things such as Cloning Blues, Literal Split Personality, or Time Travel, see Which Me?. For instances of an actor voicing multiple characters (which were named ""Talking to Himself""), see Acting for Two.
 In Real Life, multiple-personality selves do talk to each other (including talking out loud, discreetly) or can learn to do so. This communication is actually a good sign and is encouraged by doctors.
"
Twin Test|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/TwinTest|"The twin test is a quiz in which identical siblings ask other characters to point out which sibling is which. This can be done in a variety of ways, most commonly with the twins asking someone to identify them either face-to-face or using photos.
 The twin test is often Played for Laughs, especially with Trickster Twins. If someone is particularly good at the test, the siblings may become obsessed with stumping them, escalating the difficulty of the test to absurd levels by dressing the same, adopting similar mannerisms, or even pretending to be the other twin. Single-Minded Twins giving a twin test are typically played for laughs with the joke being that the obvious lack of distinct personalities between the two will make answering correctly a matter of chance. The justifications a character gives for their answer, regardless of whether they were right or wrong, are ripe with comedic potential.
 When Played for Drama, if most people fail the test, at least one of the siblings may become withdrawn or jaded about the nature of their own individuality. It may also jump-start a desire for one sibling to differentiate themselves as much as possible from the other and distancing themself from their sibling(s) in the process. Expect someone who consistently passes to be considered a True Companion or One True Love, since only someone who really gets the siblings can pass the test.
 If siblings have Identical Twin ID Tag or experienced Twin Desynch, they are far less likely to give a twin test since the answer would be obvious (though savvy twins can exploit this). In more fantastical or action-oriented stories that include an Evil Twin, a twin test may be used to confuse or thwart The Hero and is likely to include raising the stakes of answering incorrectly into a Matter of Life and Death.
 This trope also applies to Split Personality Tropes if one (or multiple) personalities asks a character if they can tell when a given personality is in control. Since typically no two personalities can be present at the same time (unless you're dealing with Literal Split Personalities), this is likely to happen over the long run, spanning multiple smaller tests.
 Compare and contrast Spot the Imposter and Impostor-Exposing Test, which similarly focuses on a character correctly identifying another from a doppleganger. What separates this trope from those is that while the twin test can include one sibling pretending to be another, this is not fundamental and typically the twins present genuine representations of themselves. Similarly, in the case of split personalities, a twin test may involve Hyde Plays Jekyll, but it is not necessary for the trope.
 See also Twin Switch and Identical Twin Mistake. Making Use of the Twin can sometimes serve as a Real Life version of this trope for viewers.
"
Two-Person Love Triangle|https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/TwoPersonLoveTriangle|"Some people get into a Love Triangle with themselves. Sometimes this gets resolved, if it's a case of Mistaken Identity; sometimes it really doesn't, if they have to maintain a Secret Identity. A very common, very old form is two kids, each chafing against their separate Arranged Marriages, meet and fall in love before they realize their betrothal is to each other, clearing up any and all moral ambiguity or conflict of duties that had driven the story up till that point. Another common version is what we might call the 'superhero' version  the superhero's Mild Mannered Alter-Ego is head-over-heels for a person who won't give them the time of day... because they're head-over-heels for the superhero.
 Taken even further, this can happen with Split Personalities, in which one character is involved with multiple different personalities of the same person. Whether or not all parties are aware of this fact is often what will determine whether this is Played for Laughs or Played for Drama, with more tragic portrayals being the ones in which everyone is well aware and suffering because of it. If Split-Personality Makeover is acknowledged in-universe, then this could justify the situation.
 See Loves My Alter Ego and Acquainted in Real Life. Compare Imaginary Love Triangle, which involves three people but is likewise built on false assumptions. May involve Likes Clark Kent, Hates Superman.
"
